H () the eighth letter of the English alphabet, is classed among the consonants, and is formed with the mouth organs in the same position as that of the succeeding vowel. It is used with certain consonants to form digraphs representing sounds which are not found in the alphabet, as sh, th, /, as in shall, thing, /ine (for zh see /274); also, to modify the sounds of some other letters, as when placed after c and p, with the former of which it represents a compound sound like that of tsh, as in charm (written also tch as in catch), with the latter, the sound of f, as in phase, phantom. In some words, mostly derived or introduced from foreign languages, h following c and g indicates that those consonants have the hard sound before e, i, and y, as in chemistry, chiromancy, chyle, Ghent, Ghibelline, etc.; in some others, ch has the sound of sh, as in chicane. See Guide to Pronunciation, // 153, 179, 181-3, 237-8.

H () The seventh degree in the diatonic scale, being used by the Germans for B natural. See B.

Ha (interj.) An exclamation denoting surprise, joy, or grief. Both as uttered and as written, it expresses a great variety of emotions, determined by the tone or the context. When repeated, ha, ha, it is an expression of laughter, satisfaction, or triumph, sometimes of derisive laughter; or sometimes it is equivalent to "Well, it is so."

Haaf (n.) The deepsea fishing for cod, ling, and tusk, off the Shetland Isles.

Haak (n.) A sea fish. See Hake.

Haar (n.) A fog; esp., a fog or mist with a chill wind.

Habeas corpus () A writ having for its object to bring a party before a court or judge; especially, one to inquire into the cause of a person's imprisonment or detention by another, with the view to protect the right to personal liberty; also, one to bring a prisoner into court to testify in a pending trial.

Habendum (n.) That part of a deed which follows the part called the premises, and determines the extent of the interest or estate granted; -- so called because it begins with the word Habendum.

Haberdash (v. i.) To deal in small wares.

Haberdasher (n.) A dealer in small wares, as tapes, pins, needles, and thread; also, a hatter.

Haberdasher (n.) A dealer in drapery goods of various descriptions, as laces, silks, trimmings, etc.

Haberdashery (n.) The goods and wares sold by a haberdasher; also (Fig.), trifles.

Haberdine (n.) A cod salted and dried.

Habergeon (n.) Properly, a short hauberk, but often used loosely for the hauberk.

Habilatory (a.) Of or pertaining to clothing; wearing clothes.

Habile (a.) Fit; qualified; also, apt.

Habiliment (n.) A garment; an article of clothing.

Habiliment (n.) Dress, in general.

Habilimented (a.) Clothed. Taylor (1630).

Habilitate (a.) Qualified or entitled.

Habilitate (v. t.) To fit out; to equip; to qualify; to entitle.

Habilitation (n.) Equipment; qualification.

Hability (n.) Ability; aptitude.

Habit (n.) The usual condition or state of a person or thing, either natural or acquired, regarded as something had, possessed, and firmly retained; as, a religious habit; his habit is morose; elms have a spreading habit; esp., physical temperament or constitution; as, a full habit of body.

Habit (n.) The general appearance and manner of life of a living organism.

Habit (n.) Fixed or established custom; ordinary course of conduct; practice; usage; hence, prominently, the involuntary tendency or aptitude to perform certain actions which is acquired by their frequent repetition; as, habit is second nature; also, peculiar ways of acting; characteristic forms of behavior.

Habit (n.) Outward appearance; attire; dress; hence, a garment; esp., a closely fitting garment or dress worn by ladies; as, a riding habit.

Habited (imp. & p. p.) of Habit

Habiting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Habit

Habit (n.) To inhabit.

Habit (n.) To dress; to clothe; to array.

Habit (n.) To accustom; to habituate. [Obs.] Chapman.

Habitability (n.) Habitableness.

Habitable (a.) Capable of being inhabited; that may be inhabited or dwelt in; as, the habitable world.

Habitakle (v.) A dwelling place.

Habitan (n.) Same as Habitant, 2.

Habitance (n.) Dwelling; abode; residence.

Habiitancy (n.) Same as Inhabitancy.

Habitant (v. t.) An inhabitant; a dweller.

Habitant (v. t.) An inhabitant or resident; -- a name applied to and denoting farmers of French descent or origin in Canada, especially in the Province of Quebec; -- usually in plural.

Habitat (v. t.) The natural abode, locality or region of an animal or plant.

Habitat (v. t.) Place where anything is commonly found.

Habitation (n.) The act of inhabiting; state of inhabiting or dwelling, or of being inhabited; occupancy.

Habitation (n.) Place of abode; settled dwelling; residence; house.

Habitator (n.) A dweller; an inhabitant.

Habited (p. p. & a.) Clothed; arrayed; dressed; as, he was habited like a shepherd.

Habited (p. p. & a.) Fixed by habit; accustomed.

Habited (p. p. & a.) Inhabited.

Habitual (n.) Formed or acquired by habit or use.

Habitual (n.) According to habit; established by habit; customary; constant; as, the habiual practice of sin.

Habituated (imp. & p. p.) of Habituate

Habituating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Habituate

Habituate (v. t.) To make accustomed; to accustom; to familiarize.

Habituate (v. t.) To settle as an inhabitant.

Habituate (a.) Firmly established by custom; formed by habit; habitual.

Habituation (n.) The act of habituating, or accustoming; the state of being habituated.

Habitude (n.) Habitual attitude; usual or accustomed state with reference to something else; established or usual relations.

Habitude (n.) Habitual association, intercourse, or familiarity.

Habitude (n.) Habit of body or of action.

Habitue (n.) One who habitually frequents a place; as, an habitue of a theater.

Habiture (n.) Habitude.

Habitus (n.) Habitude; mode of life; general appearance.

Hable (a.) See Habile.

Habnab (adv.) By chance.

Hachure (n.) A short line used in drawing and engraving, especially in shading and denoting different surfaces, as in map drawing. See Hatching.

Hacienda (n.) A large estate where work of any kind is done, as agriculture, manufacturing, mining, or raising of animals; a cultivated farm, with a good house, in distinction from a farming establishment with rude huts for herdsmen, etc.; -- a word used in Spanish-American regions.

Hack (n.) A frame or grating of various kinds; as, a frame for drying bricks, fish, or cheese; a rack for feeding cattle; a grating in a mill race, etc.

Hack (n.) Unburned brick or tile, stacked up for drying.

Hacked (imp. & p. p.) of Hack

Hacking (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hack

Hack (v. t.) To cut irregulary, without skill or definite purpose; to notch; to mangle by repeated strokes of a cutting instrument; as, to hack a post.

Hack (v. t.) Fig.: To mangle in speaking.

Hack (v. i.) To cough faintly and frequently, or in a short, broken manner; as, a hacking cough.

Hack (n.) A notch; a cut.

Hack (n.) An implement for cutting a notch; a large pick used in breaking stone.

Hack (n.) A hacking; a catch in speaking; a short, broken cough.

Hack (n.) A kick on the shins.

Hack (n.) A horse, hackneyed or let out for common hire; also, a horse used in all kinds of work, or a saddle horse, as distinguished from hunting and carriage horses.

Hack (n.) A coach or carriage let for hire; particularly, a a coach with two seats inside facing each other; a hackney coach.

Hack (n.) A bookmaker who hires himself out for any sort of literary work; an overworked man; a drudge.

Hack (n.) A procuress.

Hack (a.) Hackneyed; hired; mercenary.

Hack (v. t.) To use as a hack; to let out for hire.

Hack (v. t.) To use frequently and indiscriminately, so as to render trite and commonplace.

Hack (v. i.) To be exposed or offered or to common use for hire; to turn prostitute.

Hack (v. i.) To live the life of a drudge or hack.

Hackamore (n.) A halter consisting of a long leather or rope strap and headstall, -- used for leading or tieing a pack animal.

Hackberry (n.) A genus of trees (Celtis) related to the elm, but bearing drupes with scanty, but often edible, pulp. C. occidentalis is common in the Eastern United States.

Hackbolt (n.) The greater shearwater or hagdon. See Hagdon.

Hackbuss (n.) Same as Hagbut.

Hackee (n.) The chipmunk; also, the chickaree or red squirrel.

Hacker (n.) One who, or that which, hacks. Specifically: A cutting instrument for making notches; esp., one used for notching pine trees in collecting turpentine; a hack.

Hackery (n.) A cart with wooden wheels, drawn by bullocks.

Hackle (n.) A comb for dressing flax, raw silk, etc.; a hatchel.

Hackle (n.) Any flimsy substance unspun, as raw silk.

Hackle (n.) One of the peculiar, long, narrow feathers on the neck of fowls, most noticeable on the cock, -- often used in making artificial flies; hence, any feather so used.

Hackle (n.) An artificial fly for angling, made of feathers.

Hackled (imp. & p. p.) of Hackle

Hackling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hackle

Hackle (v. t.) To separate, as the coarse part of flax or hemp from the fine, by drawing it through the teeth of a hackle or hatchel.

Hackle (v. t.) To tear asunder; to break in pieces.

Hackly (a.) Rough or broken, as if hacked.

Hackly (a.) Having fine, short, and sharp points on the surface; as, the hackly fracture of metallic iron.

Hackmen (pl. ) of Hackman

Hackman (n.) The driver of a hack or carriage for public hire.

Hackmatack (n.) The American larch (Larix Americana), a coniferous tree with slender deciduous leaves; also, its heavy, close-grained timber. Called also tamarack.

Hackneys (pl. ) of Hackney

Hackney (n.) A horse for riding or driving; a nag; a pony.

Hackney (n.) A horse or pony kept for hire.

Hackney (n.) A carriage kept for hire; a hack; a hackney coach.

Hackney (n.) A hired drudge; a hireling; a prostitute.

Hackney (a.) Let out for hire; devoted to common use; hence, much used; trite; mean; as, hackney coaches; hackney authors.

Hackneyed (imp. & p. p.) of Hackney

Hackneying (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hackney

Hackney (v. t.) To devote to common or frequent use, as a horse or carriage; to wear out in common service; to make trite or commonplace; as, a hackneyed metaphor or quotation.

Hackney (v. t.) To carry in a hackney coach.

Hackneymen (pl. ) of Hackneyman

Hackneyman (n.) A man who lets horses and carriages for hire.

Hackster (n.) A bully; a bravo; a ruffian; an assassin.

Hacqueton (n.) Same as Acton.

Had (imp. & p. p.) See Have.

Hadder (n.) Heather; heath.

Haddie (n.) The haddock.

Haddock (n.) A marine food fish (Melanogrammus aeglefinus), allied to the cod, inhabiting the northern coasts of Europe and America. It has a dark lateral line and a black spot on each side of the body, just back of the gills. Galled also haddie, and dickie.

Hade (n.) The descent of a hill.

Hade (n.) The inclination or deviation from the vertical of any mineral vein.

Hade (v. i.) To deviate from the vertical; -- said of a vein, fault, or lode.

Hades (n.) The nether world (according to classical mythology, the abode of the shades, ruled over by Hades or Pluto); the invisible world; the grave.

Hadj (n.) The pilgrimage to Mecca, performed by Mohammedans.

Hadji (n.) A Mohammedan pilgrim to Mecca; -- used among Orientals as a respectful salutation or a title of honor.

Hadji (n.) A Greek or Armenian who has visited the holy sepulcher at Jerusalem.

Hadrosaurus (n.) An American herbivorous dinosaur of great size, allied to the iguanodon. It is found in the Cretaceous formation.

Haecceity () Literally, this-ness. A scholastic term to express individuality or singleness; as, this book.

Haema- () Alt. of Haemo-

Haemato- () Alt. of Haemo-

Haemo- () Combining forms indicating relation or resemblance to blood, association with blood; as, haemapod, haematogenesis, haemoscope.

Haemachrome (n.) Hematin.

Haemacyanin (n.) A substance found in the blood of the octopus, which gives to it its blue color.

Haemacytometer (n.) An apparatus for determining the number of corpuscles in a given quantity of blood.

Haemad (adv.) Toward the haemal side; on the haemal side of; -- opposed to neurad.

Haemadrometer (n.) Alt. of Haemadremometer

Haemadremometer (n.) Same as Hemadrometer.

Haemadrometry (n.) Alt. of Haemadromometry

Haemadromometry (n.) Same as Hemadrometry.

Haemadromograph (n.) An instrument for registering the velocity of the blood.

Haemadynameter () Alt. of Haemadynamometer

Haemadynamometer () Same as Hemadynamometer.

Haemadynamics (n.) Same as Hemadynamics.

Haemal (a.) Pertaining to the blood or blood vessels; also, ventral. See Hemal.

Haemaphaein (n.) A brownish substance sometimes found in the blood, in cases of jaundice.

Haemapod (n.) An haemapodous animal.

Haemapodous (a.) Having the limbs on, or directed toward, the ventral or hemal side, as in vertebrates; -- opposed to neuropodous.

Haemapoietic (a.) Bloodforming; as, the haemapoietic function of the spleen.

Haemapophysis (n.) Same as Hemapophysis.

Haemastatics (n.) Same as Hemastatics.

Haematachometer (n.) A form of apparatus (somewhat different from the hemadrometer) for measuring the velocity of the blood.

Haematachometry (n.) The measurement of the velocity of the blood.

Haematemesis (n.) Same as Hematemesis.

Haematic (a.) Of or pertaining to the blood; sanguine; brownish red.

Haematin (n.) Same as Hematin.

Haematinometer (n.) Same as Hematinometer.

Haematinometric (a.) Same as Hematinometric.

Haematite (n.) Same as Hematite.

Haematitic (a.) Of a blood-red color; crimson; (Bot.) brownish red.

Haemato- (prefix.) See Haema-.

Haematoblast (n.) One of the very minute, disk-shaped bodies found in blood with the ordinary red corpuscles and white corpuscles; a third kind of blood corpuscle, supposed by some to be an early stage in the development of the red corpuscles; -- called also blood plaque, and blood plate.

Haematocrya (n. pl.) The cold-blooded vertebrates. Same as Hematocrya.

Haematocryal (a.) Cold-blooded.

Haematocrystallin (n.) Same as Hematocrystallin.

Haematodynamometer (n.) Same as Hemadynamometer.

Haematogenesis (n.) The origin and development of blood.

Haematogenesis (n.) The transformation of venous arterial blood by respiration; hematosis.

Haematogenic (a.) Relating to haematogenesis.

Haematogenous (a.) Originating in the blood.

Haematoglobulin (n.) Same as Hematoglobin.

Haematoid (a.) Same as Hematoid.

Haematoidin (n.) Same as Hematoidin.

Haematoin (n.) A substance formed from the hematin of blood, by removal of the iron through the action of concentrated sulphuric acid. Two like bodies, called respectively haematoporphyrin and haematolin, are formed in a similar manner.

Haematolin (n.) See Haematoin.

Haematology (n.) The science which treats of the blood. Same as Hematology.

Haematometer (n.) Same as Hemadynamometer.

Haematometer (n.) An instrument for determining the number of blood corpuscles in a given quantity of blood.

Haematophlina (n. pl.) A division of Cheiroptera, including the bloodsucking bats. See Vampire.

Haematoplast (n.) Same as Haematoblast.

Haematoplastic (a.) Blood formative; -- applied to a substance in early fetal life, which breaks up gradually into blood vessels.

Haematoporphyrin (n.) See Haematoin.

Haematosac (n.) A vascular sac connected, beneath the brain, in many fishes, with the infundibulum.

Haematoscope (n.) A haemoscope.

Haematosin (n.) Hematin.

Haematosis (n.) Same as Hematosis.

Haematotherma (n. pl.) Same as Hematotherma.

Haematothermal (a.) Warm-blooded; homoiothermal.

Haematothorax (n.) Same as Hemothorax.

Haematexylin (n.) The coloring principle of logwood. It is obtained as a yellow crystalline substance, C16H14O6, with a sweetish taste. Formerly called also hematin.

Haematoxylon (n.) A genus of leguminous plants containing but a single species, the H. Campechianum or logwood tree, native in Yucatan.

Haematozoa (pl. ) of Haematozoon

Haematozoon (n.) A parasite inhabiting the blood

Haematozoon (n.) Certain species of nematodes of the genus Filaria, sometimes found in the blood of man, the horse, the dog, etc.

Haematozoon (n.) The trematode, Bilharzia haematobia, which infests the inhabitants of Egypt and other parts of Africa, often causing death.

Haemic (a.) Pertaining to the blood; hemal.

Haemin (n.) Same as Hemin.

Haemo- (prefix.) See Haema-.

Haemochrome (n.) Same as Haemachrome.

Haemochromogen (n.) A body obtained from hemoglobin, by the action of reducing agents in the absence of oxygen.

Haemochromometer (n.) An apparatus for measuring the amount of hemoglobin in a fluid, by comparing it with a solution of known strength and of normal color.

Haemocyanin (n.) Same as Haemacyanin.

Haemocytolysis (n.) See Haemocytotrypsis.

Haemocytometer (n.) See Haemacytometer.

Haemocytotrypsis (n.) A breaking up of the blood corpuscles, as by pressure, in distinction from solution of the corpuscles, or haemcytolysis.

Haemodromograph (n.) Same as Haemadromograph.

Haemodynameter (n.) Same as Hemadynamics.

Haemoglobin (n.) Same as Hemoglobin.

Haemoglobinometer (n.) Same as Hemochromometer.

Haemolutein (n.) See Hematoidin.

Haemomanometer (n.) Same as Hemadynamometer.

Haemometer (n.) Same as Hemadynamometer.

Haemony (n.) A plant described by Milton as "of sovereign use against all enchantments."

Haemoplastic (a.) Same as Haematoplastic.

Haemorrhoidal (a.) Same as Hemorrhoidal.

Haemoscope (n.) An instrument devised by Hermann, for regulating and measuring the thickness of a layer of blood for spectroscopic examination.

Haemostatic (a.) Same as Hemostatic.

Haemotachometer (n.) Same as Haematachometer.

Haemotachometry (n.) Same as Haematachometry.

Haf (imp.) Hove.

Haffle (v. i.) To stammer; to speak unintelligibly; to prevaricate.

Haft (n.) A handle; that part of an instrument or vessel taken into the hand, and by which it is held and used; -- said chiefly of a knife, sword, or dagger; the hilt.

Haft (n.) A dwelling.

Haft (v. t.) To set in, or furnish with, a haft; as, to haft a dagger.

Hafter (n.) A caviler; a wrangler.

Hag (n.) A witch, sorceress, or enchantress; also, a wizard.

Hag (n.) An ugly old woman.

Hag (n.) A fury; a she-monster.

Hag (n.) An eel-like marine marsipobranch (Myxine glutinosa), allied to the lamprey. It has a suctorial mouth, with labial appendages, and a single pair of gill openings. It is the type of the order Hyperotpeta. Called also hagfish, borer, slime eel, sucker, and sleepmarken.

Hag (n.) The hagdon or shearwater.

Hag (n.) An appearance of light and fire on a horse's mane or a man's hair.

Hagged (imp. & p. p.) of Hag

Hagging (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hag

Hag (v. t.) To harass; to weary with vexation.

Hag (n.) A small wood, or part of a wood or copse, which is marked off or inclosed for felling, or which has been felled.

Hag (n.) A quagmire; mossy ground where peat or turf has been cut.

Hagberry (n.) A plant of the genus Prunus (P. Padus); the bird cherry.

Hagborn (a.) Born of a hag or witch.

Hagbut (n.) A harquebus, of which the but was bent down or hooked for convenience in taking aim.

Hagbutter (n.) A soldier armed with a hagbut or arquebus.

Hagdon (n.) One of several species of sea birds of the genus Puffinus; esp., P. major, the greater shearwarter, and P. Stricklandi, the black hagdon or sooty shearwater; -- called also hagdown, haglin, and hag. See Shearwater.

Haggadoth (pl. ) of Haggada

Haggada (n.) A story, anecdote, or legend in the Talmud, to explain or illustrate the text of the Old Testament.

Haggard (a.) Wild or intractable; disposed to break away from duty; untamed; as, a haggard or refractory hawk.

Haggard (a.) Having the expression of one wasted by want or suffering; hollow-eyed; having the features distorted or wasted, or anxious in appearance; as, haggard features, eyes.

Haggard (a.) A young or untrained hawk or falcon.

Haggard (a.) A fierce, intractable creature.

Haggard (a.) A hag.

Haggard (n.) A stackyard.

Haggardly (adv.) In a haggard manner.

Hagged (a.) Like a hag; lean; ugly.

Haggis (n.) A Scotch pudding made of the heart, liver, lights, etc., of a sheep or lamb, minced with suet, onions, oatmeal, etc., highly seasoned, and boiled in the stomach of the same animal; minced head and pluck.

Haggish (a.) Like a hag; ugly; wrinkled.

Haggishly (adv.) In the manner of a hag.

Haggled (imp. & p. p.) of Haggle

Haggling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Haggle

Haggle (v. t.) To cut roughly or hack; to cut into small pieces; to notch or cut in an unskillful manner; to make rough or mangle by cutting; as, a boy haggles a stick of wood.

Haggle (v. i.) To be difficult in bargaining; to stick at small matters; to chaffer; to higgle.

Haggle (n.) The act or process of haggling.

Haggler (n.) One who haggles or is difficult in bargaining.

Haggler (n.) One who forestalls a market; a middleman between producer and dealer in London vegetable markets.

Hagiarchy (n.) A sacred government; by holy orders of men.

Hagiocracy (n.) Government by a priesthood; hierarchy.

Hagiographa (n. pl.) The last of the three Jewish divisions of the Old Testament, or that portion not contained in the Law and the Prophets. It comprises Psalms, Proverbs, Job, Canticles, Ruth, Lamentations, Ecclesiastes, Esther, Daniel, Ezra, Nehemiah, and Chronicles.

Hagiographa (n. pl.) The lives of the saints.

Hagiographal () Pertaining to the hagiographa, or to sacred writings.

Hagiographer (n.) One of the writers of the hagiographa; a writer of lives of the saints.

Hagiography (n.) Same Hagiographa.

Hagiolatry (n.) The invocation or worship of saints.

Hagiologist (n.) One who treats of the sacred writings; a writer of the lives of the saints; a hagiographer.

Hagiology (n.) The history or description of the sacred writings or of sacred persons; a narrative of the lives of the saints; a catalogue of saints.

Hagioscope (n.) An opening made in the interior walls of a cruciform church to afford a view of the altar to those in the transepts; -- called, in architecture, a squint.

Hag-ridden (a.) Ridden by a hag or witch; hence, afflicted with nightmare.

Hagseed (n.) The offspring of a hag.

Hagship (n.) The state or title of a hag.

Hag-taper (n.) The great woolly mullein (Verbascum Thapsus).

Haguebut (n.) See Hagbut.

Hah (interj.) Same as Ha.

Ha-ha (n.) A sunk fence; a fence, wall, or ditch, not visible till one is close upon it.

Haidingerite (n.) A mineral consisting of the arseniate of lime; -- so named in honor of W. Haidinger, of Vienna.

Haiduck (n.) Formerly, a mercenary foot soldier in Hungary, now, a halberdier of a Hungarian noble, or an attendant in German or Hungarian courts.

Haik (n.) A large piece of woolen or cotton cloth worn by Arabs as an outer garment.

Haikal (n.) The central chapel of the three forming the sanctuary of a Coptic church. It contains the high altar, and is usually closed by an embroidered curtain.

Hail (n.) Small roundish masses of ice precipitated from the clouds, where they are formed by the congelation of vapor. The separate masses or grains are called hailstones.

Halled (imp. & p. p.) of Hail

Halting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hail

Hail (v. i.) To pour down particles of ice, or frozen vapors.

Hail (v. t.) To pour forcibly down, as hail.

Hail (a.) Healthy. See Hale (the preferable spelling).

Hail (v. t.) To call loudly to, or after; to accost; to salute; to address.

Hail (v. t.) To name; to designate; to call.

Hail (v. i.) To declare, by hailing, the port from which a vessel sails or where she is registered; hence, to sail; to come; -- used with from; as, the steamer hails from New York.

Hail (v. i.) To report as one's home or the place from whence one comes; to come; -- with from.

Hail (v. t.) An exclamation of respectful or reverent salutation, or, occasionally, of familiar greeting.

Hail (n.) A wish of health; a salutation; a loud call.

Hail-fellow (n.) An intimate companion.

Hailse (v. t.) To greet; to salute.

Hailshot (n. pl.) Small shot which scatter like hailstones.

Hailstone (n.) A single particle of ice falling from a cloud; a frozen raindrop; a pellet of hail.

Hailstorm (n.) A storm accompanied with hail; a shower of hail.

Haily (a.) Of hail.

Han (v. t.) To inclose for mowing; to set aside for grass.

Hain't () A contraction of have not or has not; as, I hain't, he hain't, we hain't.

Hair (n.) The collection or mass of filaments growing from the skin of an animal, and forming a covering for a part of the head or for any part or the whole of the body.

Hair (n.) One the above-mentioned filaments, consisting, in invertebrate animals, of a long, tubular part which is free and flexible, and a bulbous root imbedded in the skin.

Hair (n.) Hair (human or animal) used for various purposes; as, hair for stuffing cushions.

Hair (n.) A slender outgrowth from the chitinous cuticle of insects, spiders, crustaceans, and other invertebrates. Such hairs are totally unlike those of vertebrates in structure, composition, and mode of growth.

Hair (n.) An outgrowth of the epidermis, consisting of one or of several cells, whether pointed, hooked, knobbed, or stellated. Internal hairs occur in the flower stalk of the yellow frog lily (Nuphar).

Hair (n.) A spring device used in a hair-trigger firearm.

Hair (n.) A haircloth.

Hair (n.) Any very small distance, or degree; a hairbreadth.

Hairbell (n.) See Harebell.

Hairbird (n.) The chipping sparrow.

Hairbrained (a.) See Harebrained.

Hairbreadth () Alt. of Hair'sbreadth

Hair'sbreadth () The diameter or breadth of a hair; a very small distance; sometimes, definitely, the forty-eighth part of an inch.

Hairbreadth (a.) Having the breadth of a hair; very narrow; as, a hairbreadth escape.

Hair-brown (a.) Of a clear tint of brown, resembling brown human hair. It is composed of equal proportions of red and green.

Hairbrush (n.) A brush for cleansing and smoothing the hair.

Haircloth (n.) Stuff or cloth made wholly or in part of hair.

Hairdresser (n.) One who dresses or cuts hair; a barber.

Haired (a.) Having hair.

Haired (a.) In composition: Having (such) hair; as, red-haired.

Hairen (a.) Hairy.

Hair grass () A grass with very slender leaves or branches; as the Agrostis scabra, and several species of Aira or Deschampsia.

Hairiness (n.) The state of abounding, or being covered, with hair.

Hairless (a.) Destitute of hair.

Hairpin (n.) A pin, usually forked, or of bent wire, for fastening the hair in place, -- used by women.

Hair-salt (n.) A variety of native Epsom salt occurring in silky fibers.

Hairsplitter (n.) One who makes excessively nice or needless distinctions in reasoning; one who quibbles.

Hairsplitting (a.) Making excessively nice or trivial distinctions in reasoning; subtle.

Hairsplitting (n.) The act or practice of making trivial distinctions.

Hairspring (n.) The slender recoil spring which regulates the motion of the balance in a timepiece.

Hairstreak (n.) A butterfly of the genus Thecla; as, the green hairstreak (T. rubi).

Hairtail (n.) Any species of marine fishes of the genus Trichiurus; esp., T. lepterus of Europe and America. They are long and like a band, with a slender, pointed tail. Called also bladefish.

Hairworm () A nematoid worm of the genus Gordius, resembling a hair. See Gordius.

Hairy (a.) Bearing or covered with hair; made of or resembling hair; rough with hair; rough with hair; rough with hair; hirsute.

Haitian (a. & n.) See Haytian.

Haye (n.) The Egyptian asp or cobra (Naja haje.) It is related to the cobra of India, and like the latter has the power of inflating its neck into a hood. Its bite is very venomous. It is supposed to be the snake by means of whose bite Cleopatra committed suicide, and hence is sometimes called Cleopatra's snake or asp. See Asp.

Hake (n.) A drying shed, as for unburned tile.

Hake (n.) One of several species of marine gadoid fishes, of the genera Phycis, Merlucius, and allies. The common European hake is M. vulgaris; the American silver hake or whiting is M. bilinearis. Two American species (Phycis chuss and P. tenius) are important food fishes, and are also valued for their oil and sounds. Called also squirrel hake, and codling.

Hake (v. t.) To loiter; to sneak.

Hake's-dame (n.) See Forkbeard.

Haketon (n.) Same as Acton.

Hakim (n.) A wise man; a physician, esp. a Mohammedan.

Hakim (n.) A Mohammedan title for a ruler; a judge.

Halachoth (pl. ) of Halacha

Halacha (n.) The general term for the Hebrew oral or traditional law; one of two branches of exposition in the Midrash. See Midrash.

Halation (n.) An appearance as of a halo of light, surrounding the edges of dark objects in a photographic picture.

Halberd (n.) An ancient long-handled weapon, of which the head had a point and several long, sharp edges, curved or straight, and sometimes additional points. The heads were sometimes of very elaborate form.

Halberdier (n.) One who is armed with a halberd.

Halberd-shaped (a.) Hastate.

Halcyon (n.) A kingfisher. By modern ornithologists restricted to a genus including a limited number of species having omnivorous habits, as the sacred kingfisher (Halcyon sancta) of Australia.

Halcyon (a.) Pertaining to, or resembling, the halcyon, which was anciently said to lay her eggs in nests on or near the sea during the calm weather about the winter solstice.

Halcyon (a.) Hence: Calm; quiet; peaceful; undisturbed; happy.

Halcyonian (a.) Halcyon; calm.

Halcyonold (a. & n.) See Alcyonoid.

Hale (a.) Sound; entire; healthy; robust; not impaired; as, a hale body.

Hale (n.) Welfare.

Haled (imp. & p. p.) of Hale

Haling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hale

Hale (v. t.) To pull; to drag; to haul.

Halesia (n.) A genus of American shrubs containing several species, called snowdrop trees, or silver-bell trees. They have showy, white flowers, drooping on slender pedicels.

Half (a.) Consisting of a moiety, or half; as, a half bushel; a half hour; a half dollar; a half view.

Half (a.) Consisting of some indefinite portion resembling a half; approximately a half, whether more or less; partial; imperfect; as, a half dream; half knowledge.

Half (adv.) In an equal part or degree; in some pa/ appro/mating a half; partially; imperfectly; as, half-colored, half done, half-hearted, half persuaded, half conscious.

Halves (pl. ) of Half

Half (a.) Part; side; behalf.

Half (a.) One of two equal parts into which anything may be divided, or considered as divided; -- sometimes followed by of; as, a half of an apple.

Half (v. t.) To halve. [Obs.] See Halve.

Half-and-half (n.) A mixture of two malt liquors, esp. porter and ale, in about equal parts.

Halfbeak (n.) Any slender, marine fish of the genus Hemirhamphus, having the upper jaw much shorter than the lower; -- called also balahoo.

Half blood () The relation between persons born of the same father or of the same mother, but not of both; as, a brother or sister of the half blood. See Blood, n., 2 and 4.

Half blood (n.) A person so related to another.

Half blood (n.) A person whose father and mother are of different races; a half-breed.

Half-blooded (a.) Proceeding from a male and female of different breeds or races; having only one parent of good stock; as, a half-blooded sheep.

Half-blooded (a.) Degenerate; mean.

Half-boot (n.) A boot with a short top covering only the ankle. See Cocker, and Congress boot, under Congress.

Half-bound (n.) Having only the back and corners in leather, as a book.

Half-bred (a.) Half-blooded.

Half-bred (a.) Imperfectly acquainted with the rules of good-breeding; not well trained.

Half-breed (a.) Half-blooded.

Half-breed (n.) A person who is blooded; the offspring of parents of different races, especially of the American Indian and the white race.

Half-brother (n.) A brother by one parent, but not by both.

Half-caste (n.) One born of a European parent on the one side, and of a Hindoo or Mohammedan on the other. Also adjective; as, half-caste parents.

Half-clammed (a.) Half-filled.

Halfcocked (imp. & p. p.) of Halfcock

Halfcocking (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Halfcock

Halfcock (v. t.) To set the cock of (a firearm) at the first notch.

Half-cracked (a.) Half-demented; half-witted.

Half-deck (n.) A shell of the genus Crepidula; a boat shell. See Boat shell.

Half-deck (n.) See Half deck, under Deck.

Half-decked (a.) Partially decked.

Halfen (a.) Wanting half its due qualities.

Halfendeal (adv.) Half; by the part.

Halfendeal (n.) A half part.

Halfer (n.) One who possesses or gives half only; one who shares.

Halfer (n.) A male fallow deer gelded.

Half-faced (a.) Showing only part of the face; wretched looking; meager.

Half-fish (n.) A salmon in its fifth year of growth.

Half-hatched (a.) Imperfectly hatched; as, half-hatched eggs.

Half-heard (a.) Imperfectly or partly heard to the end.

Half-hearted (a.) Wanting in heart or spirit; ungenerous; unkind.

Half-hearted (a.) Lacking zeal or courage; lukewarm.

Half-hourly (a.) Done or happening at intervals of half an hour.

Half-learned (a.) Imperfectly learned.

Half-length (a.) Of half the whole or ordinary length, as a picture.

Half-mast (n.) A point some distance below the top of a mast or staff; as, a flag a half-mast (a token of mourning, etc.).

Half-moon (n.) The moon at the quarters, when half its disk appears illuminated.

Half-moon (n.) The shape of a half-moon; a crescent.

Half-moon (n.) An outwork composed of two faces, forming a salient angle whose gorge resembles a half-moon; -- now called a ravelin.

Half-moon (n.) A marine, sparoid, food fish of California (Caesiosoma Californiense). The body is ovate, blackish above, blue or gray below. Called also medialuna.

Halfness (n.) The quality of being half; incompleteness.

Halfpace (n.) A platform of a staircase where the stair turns back in exactly the reverse direction of the lower flight. See Quarterpace.

Half-pike (n.) A short pike, sometimes carried by officers of infantry, sometimes used in boarding ships; a spontoon.

Half-port (n.) One half of a shutter made in two parts for closing a porthole.

Half-ray (n.) A straight line considered as drawn from a center to an indefinite distance in one direction, the complete ray being the whole line drawn to an indefinite distance in both directions.

Half-read (a.) Informed by insufficient reading; superficial; shallow.

Half seas over () Half drunk.

Half-sighted (a.) Seeing imperfectly; having weak discernment.

Half-sister (n.) A sister by one parent only.

Half-strained (a.) Half-bred; imperfect.

Half-sword (n.) Half the length of a sword; close fight.

Half-timbered (a.) Constructed of a timber frame, having the spaces filled in with masonry; -- said of buildings.

Half-tounue (n.) A jury, for the trial of a foreigner, composed equally of citizens and aliens.

Halfway (adv.) In the middle; at half the distance; imperfectly; partially; as, he halfway yielded.

Halfway (a.) Equally distant from the extremes; situated at an intermediate point; midway.

Half-wit (n.) A foolish; a dolt; a blockhead; a dunce.

Half-witted (a.) Weak in intellect; silly.

Half-yearly (a.) Two in a year; semiannual. -- adv. Twice in a year; semiannually.

Halibut (n.) A large, northern, marine flatfish (Hippoglossus vulgaris), of the family Pleuronectidae. It often grows very large, weighing more than three hundred pounds. It is an important food fish.

Halichondriae (n. pl.) An order of sponges, having simple siliceous spicules and keratose fibers; -- called also Keratosilicoidea.

Halicore (n.) Same as Dugong.

Halidom (n.) Holiness; sanctity; sacred oath; sacred things; sanctuary; -- used chiefly in oaths.

Halidom (n.) Holy doom; the Last Day.

Halieutics (n.) A treatise upon fish or the art of fishing; ichthyology.

Halmas (a.) The feast of All Saints; Hallowmas.

Haliographer (n.) One who writes about or describes the sea.

Haliography (n.) Description of the sea; the science that treats of the sea.

Haliotis (n.) A genus of marine shells; the ear-shells. See Abalone.

Haliotoid (a.) Like or pertaining to the genus Haliotis; ear-shaped.

Halisauria (n. pl.) The Enaliosauria.

Halite (n.) Native salt; sodium chloride.

Halituous (a.) Produced by, or like, breath; vaporous.

Halk (n.) A nook; a corner.

Hall (n.) A building or room of considerable size and stateliness, used for public purposes; as, Westminster Hall, in London.

Hall (n.) The chief room in a castle or manor house, and in early times the only public room, serving as the place of gathering for the lord's family with the retainers and servants, also for cooking and eating. It was often contrasted with the bower, which was the private or sleeping apartment.

Hall (n.) A vestibule, entrance room, etc., in the more elaborated buildings of later times.

Hall (n.) Any corridor or passage in a building.

Hall (n.) A name given to many manor houses because the magistrate's court was held in the hall of his mansion; a chief mansion house.

Hall (n.) A college in an English university (at Oxford, an unendowed college).

Hall (n.) The apartment in which English university students dine in common; hence, the dinner itself; as, hall is at six o'clock.

Hall (n.) Cleared passageway in a crowd; -- formerly an exclamation.

Hallage (n.) A fee or toll paid for goods sold in a hall.

Halleluiah (n. & interj.) Alt. of Hallelujah

Hallelujah (n. & interj.) Praise ye Jehovah; praise ye the Lord; -- an exclamation used chiefly in songs of praise or thanksgiving to God, and as an expression of gratitude or adoration.

Hallelujatic (a.) Pertaining to, or containing, hallelujahs.

Halliard (n.) See Halyard.

Hallidome (n.) Same as Halidom.

Hallier (n.) A kind of net for catching birds.

Hall-mark (n.) The official stamp of the Goldsmiths' Company and other assay offices, in the United Kingdom, on gold and silver articles, attesting their purity. Also used figuratively; -- as, a word or phrase lacks the hall-mark of the best writers.

Halloa () See Halloo.

Halloo (n.) A loud exclamation; a call to invite attention or to incite a person or an animal; a shout.

Hallooed (imp. & p. p.) of Halloo

Halloing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Halloo

Halloo (v. i.) To cry out; to exclaim with a loud voice; to call to a person, as by the word halloo.

Halloo (v. t.) To encourage with shouts.

Halloo (v. t.) To chase with shouts or outcries.

Halloo (v. t.) To call or shout to; to hail.

Halloo (n.) An exclamation to call attention or to encourage one.

Hallowed (imp. & p. p.) of Hallow

Hallowing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hallow

Hallow (v. t.) To make holy; to set apart for holy or religious use; to consecrate; to treat or keep as sacred; to reverence.

Halloween (n.) The evening preceding Allhallows or All Saints' Day.

Hallowmas (n.) The feast of All Saints, or Allhallows.

Halloysite (n.) A claylike mineral, occurring in soft, smooth, amorphous masses, of a whitish color.

Hallucal (a.) Of or pertaining to the hallux.

Hallucinate (v. i.) To wander; to go astray; to err; to blunder; -- used of mental processes.

Hallucination (n.) The act of hallucinating; a wandering of the mind; error; mistake; a blunder.

Hallucination (n.) The perception of objects which have no reality, or of sensations which have no corresponding external cause, arising from disorder or the nervous system, as in delirium tremens; delusion.

Hallucinator (n.) One whose judgment and acts are affected by hallucinations; one who errs on account of his hallucinations.

Hallucinatory (a.) Partaking of, or tending to produce, hallucination.

Hallux (n.) The first, or preaxial, digit of the hind limb, corresponding to the pollux in the fore limb; the great toe; the hind toe of birds.

Halm (n.) Same as Haulm.

Halma (n.) The long jump, with weights in the hands, -- the most important of the exercises of the Pentathlon.

Halos (pl. ) of Halo

Halo (n.) A luminous circle, usually prismatically colored, round the sun or moon, and supposed to be caused by the refraction of light through crystals of ice in the atmosphere. Connected with halos there are often white bands, crosses, or arches, resulting from the same atmospheric conditions.

Halo (n.) A circle of light; especially, the bright ring represented in painting as surrounding the heads of saints and other holy persons; a glory; a nimbus.

Halo (n.) An ideal glory investing, or affecting one's perception of, an object.

Halo (n.) A colored circle around a nipple; an areola.

Haloed (imp. & p. p.) of Halo

Haloing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Halo

Halo (v. t. & i.) To form, or surround with, a halo; to encircle with, or as with, a halo.

Haloed (a.) Surrounded with a halo; invested with an ideal glory; glorified.

Halogen (n.) An electro-negative element or radical, which, by combination with a metal, forms a haloid salt; especially, chlorine, bromine, and iodine; sometimes, also, fluorine and cyanogen. See Chlorine family, under Chlorine.

Halogenous (a.) Of the nature of a halogen.

Haloid (a.) Resembling salt; -- said of certain binary compounds consisting of a metal united to a negative element or radical, and now chiefly applied to the chlorides, bromides, iodides, and sometimes also to the fluorides and cyanides.

Haloid (n.) A haloid substance.

Halomancy (n.) See Alomancy.

Halometer (n.) An instrument for measuring the forms and angles of salts and crystals; a goniometer.

Halones (n. pl.) Alternating transparent and opaque white rings which are seen outside the blastoderm, on the surface of the developing egg of the hen and other birds.

Halophyte (n.) A plant found growing in salt marshes, or in the sea.

Haloscope (n.) An instrument for exhibition or illustration of the phenomena of halos, parhelia, and the like.

Halotrichite (n.) An iron alum occurring in silky fibrous aggregates of a yellowish white color.

Haloxyline (n.) An explosive mixture, consisting of sawdust, charcoal, niter, and ferrocyanide of potassium, used as a substitute for gunpowder.

Halp (imp.) Helped.

Halpace (n.) See Haut pas.

Hals (n.) The neck or throat.

Halse (v. t.) To embrace about the neck; to salute; to greet.

Halse (v. t.) To adjure; to beseech; to entreat.

Halsed (imp. & p. p.) of Halse

Halsing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Halse

Halse (v. t.) To haul; to hoist.

Halsening (a.) Sounding harshly in the throat; inharmonious; rough.

Halser (n.) See Hawser.

Halt () 3d pers. sing. pres. of Hold, contraction for holdeth.

Halt (n.) A stop in marching or walking, or in any action; arrest of progress.

Halted (imp. & p. p.) of Halt

Halting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Halt

Halt (v. i.) To hold one's self from proceeding; to hold up; to cease progress; to stop for a longer or shorter period; to come to a stop; to stand still.

Halt (v. i.) To stand in doubt whether to proceed, or what to do; to hesitate; to be uncertain.

Halt (v. t.) To cause to cease marching; to stop; as, the general halted his troops for refreshment.

Halt (a.) Halting or stopping in walking; lame.

Halt (n.) The act of limping; lameness.

Halt (a.) To walk lamely; to limp.

Halt (a.) To have an irregular rhythm; to be defective.

Halter (n.) One who halts or limps; a cripple.

Halter (n.) A strong strap or cord.

Halter (n.) A rope or strap, with or without a headstall, for leading or tying a horse.

Halter (n.) A rope for hanging malefactors; a noose.

Haltered (imp. & p. p.) of Halter

Haltering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Halter

Halter (v. t.) To tie by the neck with a rope, strap, or halter; to put a halter on; to subject to a hangman's halter.

Halteres (n. pl.) Balancers; the rudimentary hind wings of Diptera.

Halter-sack (n.) A term of reproach, implying that one is fit to be hanged.

Haltingly (adv.) In a halting or limping manner.

Halvans (n. pl.) Impure ore; dirty ore.

Halve (n.) A half.

Halved (imp. & p. p.) of Halve

Halving (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Halve

Halve (v. t.) To divide into two equal parts; as, to halve an apple; to be or form half of.

Halve (v. t.) To join, as two pieces of timber, by cutting away each for half its thickness at the joining place, and fitting together.

Halved (a.) Appearing as if one side, or one half, were cut away; dimidiate.

Halves (n.) pl. of Half.

Halwe (n.) A saint.

Hal'yard (v. t.) A rope or tackle for hoisting or lowering yards, sails, flags, etc.

Halysites (n.) A genus of Silurian fossil corals; the chain corals. See Chain coral, under Chain.

Ham (n.) Home.

Ham (n.) The region back of the knee joint; the popliteal space; the hock.

Ham (n.) The thigh of any animal; especially, the thigh of a hog cured by salting and smoking.

Hamadryads (pl. ) of Hamadryad

Hamadryades (pl. ) of Hamadryad

Hamadryad (n.) A tree nymph whose life ended with that of the particular tree, usually an oak, which had been her abode.

Hamadryad (n.) A large venomous East Indian snake (Orhiophagus bungarus), allied to the cobras.

Hamadryas (n.) The sacred baboon of Egypt (Cynocephalus Hamadryas).

Hamamelis (n.) A genus of plants which includes the witch-hazel (Hamamelis Virginica), a preparation of which is used medicinally.

Hamate (a.) Hooked; bent at the end into a hook; hamous.

Hamated (a.) Hooked, or set with hooks; hamate.

Hamatum (n.) See Unciform.

Hamble (v. t.) To hamstring.

Hamburg (n.) A commercial city of Germany, near the mouth of the Elbe.

Hame (n.) Home.

Hame (n.) One of the two curved pieces of wood or metal, in the harness of a draught horse, to which the traces are fastened. They are fitted upon the collar, or have pads fitting the horse's neck attached to them.

Hamel (v. t.) Same as Hamele.

Hamesecken (n.) Alt. of Hamesucken

Hamesucken (n.) The felonious seeking and invasion of a person in his dwelling house.

Hamiform (n.) Hook-shaped.

Hamilton period () A subdivision of the Devonian system of America; -- so named from Hamilton, Madison Co., New York. It includes the Marcellus, Hamilton, and Genesee epochs or groups. See the Chart of Geology.

Haminura (n.) A large edible river fish (Erythrinus macrodon) of Guiana.

Hamite (n.) A fossil cephalopod of the genus Hamites, related to the ammonites, but having the last whorl bent into a hooklike form.

Hamite (n.) A descendant of Ham, Noah's second son. See Gen. x. 6-20.

Haitic (a.) Pertaining to Ham or his descendants.

Hamlet (n.) A small village; a little cluster of houses in the country.

Hamleted (p. a.) Confined to a hamlet.

Hammer (n.) An instrument for driving nails, beating metals, and the like, consisting of a head, usually of steel or iron, fixed crosswise to a handle.

Hammer (n.) Something which in firm or action resembles the common hammer

Hammer (n.) That part of a clock which strikes upon the bell to indicate the hour.

Hammer (n.) The padded mallet of a piano, which strikes the wires, to produce the tones.

Hammer (n.) The malleus.

Hammer (n.) That part of a gunlock which strikes the percussion cap, or firing pin; the cock; formerly, however, a piece of steel covering the pan of a flintlock musket and struck by the flint of the cock to ignite the priming.

Hammer (n.) Also, a person of thing that smites or shatters; as, St. Augustine was the hammer of heresies.

Hammered (imp. & p. p.) of Hammer

Hammering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hammer

Hammer (v. t.) To beat with a hammer; to beat with heavy blows; as, to hammer iron.

Hammer (v. t.) To form or forge with a hammer; to shape by beating.

Hammer (v. t.) To form in the mind; to shape by hard intellectual labor; -- usually with out.

Hammer (v. i.) To be busy forming anything; to labor hard as if shaping something with a hammer.

Hammer (v. i.) To strike repeated blows, literally or figuratively.

Hammerable (a.) Capable of being formed or shaped by a hammer.

Hammer-beam (n.) A member of one description of roof truss, called hammer-beam truss, which is so framed as not to have a tiebeam at the top of the wall. Each principal has two hammer-beams, which occupy the situation, and to some extent serve the purpose, of a tiebeam.

Hammercloth (n.) The cloth which covers a coach box.

Hammer-dressed (a.) Having the surface roughly shaped or faced with the stonecutter's hammer; -- said of building stone.

Hammerer (n.) One who works with a hammer.

Hammer-harden (v. t.) To harden, as a metal, by hammering it in the cold state.

Hammerhead (n.) A shark of the genus Sphyrna or Zygaena, having the eyes set on projections from the sides of the head, which gives it a hammer shape. The Sphyrna zygaena is found in the North Atlantic. Called also hammer fish, and balance fish.

Hammerhead (n.) A fresh-water fish; the stone-roller.

Hammerhead (n.) An African fruit bat (Hypsignathus monstrosus); -- so called from its large blunt nozzle.

Hammerkop (n.) A bird of the Heron family; the umber.

Hammer-less (a.) Without a visible hammer; -- said of a gun having a cock or striker concealed from sight, and out of the way of an accidental touch.

Hammermen (pl. ) of Hammerman

Hammerman (n.) A hammerer; a forgeman.

Hammochrysos (n.) A stone with spangles of gold color in it.

Hammock (n.) A swinging couch or bed, usually made of netting or canvas about six feet wide, suspended by clews or cords at the ends.

Hammock (n.) A piece of land thickly wooded, and usually covered with bushes and vines. Used also adjectively; as, hammock land.

Hamose () Alt. of Hamous

Hamous () Having the end hooked or curved.

Hamper (n.) A large basket, usually with a cover, used for the packing and carrying of articles; as, a hamper of wine; a clothes hamper; an oyster hamper, which contains two bushels.

Hampered (imp. & p. p.) of Hamper

Hampering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hamper

Hamper (v. t.) To put in a hamper.

Hamper (v. t.) To put a hamper or fetter on; to shackle; to insnare; to inveigle; hence, to impede in motion or progress; to embarrass; to encumber.

Hamper (n.) A shackle; a fetter; anything which impedes.

Hamper (n.) Articles ordinarily indispensable, but in the way at certain times.

Hamshackle (v. t.) To fasten (an animal) by a rope binding the head to one of the fore legs; as, to hamshackle a horse or cow; hence, to bind or restrain; to curb.

Hamster (n.) A small European rodent (Cricetus frumentarius). It is remarkable for having a pouch on each side of the jaw, under the skin, and for its migrations.

Hamstring (n.) One of the great tendons situated in each side of the ham, or space back of the knee, and connected with the muscles of the back of the thigh.

Hamstrung (imp. & p. p.) of Hamstring

Hamstringing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hamstring

Hamstring (v. t.) To lame or disable by cutting the tendons of the ham or knee; to hough; hence, to cripple; to incapacitate; to disable.

Hamular (a.) Hooked; hooklike; hamate; as, the hamular process of the sphenoid bone.

Hamulate (a.) Furnished with a small hook; hook-shaped.

Hamule (n.) A little hook.

Hamulose (a.) Bearing a small hook at the end.

Hamuli (pl. ) of Hamulus

Hamulus (n.) A hook, or hooklike process.

Hamulus (n.) A hooked barbicel of a feather.

Han (inf. & plural pres.) To have; have.

Hanap (n.) A rich goblet, esp. one used on state occasions.

Hanaper (n.) A kind of basket, usually of wickerwork, and adapted for the packing and carrying of articles; a hamper.

Hance (v. t.) To raise; to elevate.

Hance () Alt. of Hanch

Hanch () See Hanse.

Hanch () A sudden fall or break, as the fall of the fife rail down to the gangway.

Hand (n.) That part of the fore limb below the forearm or wrist in man and monkeys, and the corresponding part in many other animals; manus; paw. See Manus.

Hand (n.) That which resembles, or to some extent performs the office of, a human hand

Hand (n.) A limb of certain animals, as the foot of a hawk, or any one of the four extremities of a monkey.

Hand (n.) An index or pointer on a dial; as, the hour or minute hand of a clock.

Hand (n.) A measure equal to a hand's breadth, -- four inches; a palm. Chiefly used in measuring the height of horses.

Hand (n.) Side; part; direction, either right or left.

Hand (n.) Power of performance; means of execution; ability; skill; dexterity.

Hand (n.) Actual performance; deed; act; workmanship; agency; hence, manner of performance.

Hand (n.) An agent; a servant, or laborer; a workman, trained or competent for special service or duty; a performer more or less skillful; as, a deck hand; a farm hand; an old hand at speaking.

Hand (n.) Handwriting; style of penmanship; as, a good, bad or running hand. Hence, a signature.

Hand (n.) Personal possession; ownership; hence, control; direction; management; -- usually in the plural.

Hand (n.) Agency in transmission from one person to another; as, to buy at first hand, that is, from the producer, or when new; at second hand, that is, when no longer in the producer's hand, or when not new.

Hand (n.) Rate; price.

Hand (n.) That which is, or may be, held in a hand at once

Hand (n.) The quota of cards received from the dealer.

Hand (n.) A bundle of tobacco leaves tied together.

Hand (n.) The small part of a gunstock near the lock, which is grasped by the hand in taking aim.

Hand staves (pl. ) of Hand

Handed (imp. & p. p.) of Hand

Handing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hand

Hand (v. t.) To give, pass, or transmit with the hand; as, he handed them the letter.

Hand (v. t.) To lead, guide, or assist with the hand; to conduct; as, to hand a lady into a carriage.

Hand (v. t.) To manage; as, I hand my oar.

Hand (v. t.) To seize; to lay hands on.

Hand (v. t.) To pledge by the hand; to handfast.

Hand (v. t.) To furl; -- said of a sail.

Hand (v. i.) To cooperate.

Handbarrow (n.) A frame or barrow, without a wheel, carried by hand.

Handbill (n.) A loose, printed sheet, to be distributed by hand.

Handbill (n.) A pruning hook.

Handbook (n.) A book of reference, to be carried in the hand; a manual; a guidebook.

Handbreadth (n.) A space equal to the breadth of the hand; a palm.

Handcart (n.) A cart drawn or pushed by hand.

Handcloth (n.) A handkerchief.

Handcraft (n.) Same as Handicraft.

-men (pl. ) of Handcraftsman

Handcraftsman (n.) A handicraftsman.

Handcuff (n.) A fastening, consisting of an iron ring around the wrist, usually connected by a chain with one on the other wrist; a manacle; -- usually in the plural.

Handcuffed (imp. & p. p.) of Handcuff

Handcuffing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Handcuff

Handcuff (v. t.) To apply handcuffs to; to manacle.

Handed (a.) With hands joined; hand in hand.

Handed (a.) Having a peculiar or characteristic hand.

Hander (n.) One who hands over or transmits; a conveyer in succession.

Handfast (n.) Hold; grasp; custody; power of confining or keeping.

Handfast (n.) Contract; specifically, espousal.

Handfast (a.) Fast by contract; betrothed by joining hands.

Handfasted (imp. & p. p.) of Handfast

Handfasting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Handfast

Handfast (v. t.) To pledge; to bind; to betroth by joining hands, in order to cohabitation, before the celebration of marriage.

Handfast (n.) Strong; steadfast.

Handfastly (adv.) In a handfast or publicly pledged manner.

Handfish (n.) The frogfish.

Hand flus (pl. ) of Handful

Handful (n.) As much as the hand will grasp or contain.

Handful (n.) A hand's breadth; four inches.

Handful (n.) A small quantity.

Hand-hole (n.) A small hole in a boiler for the insertion of the hand in cleaning, etc.

Handicap (n.) An allowance of a certain amount of time or distance in starting, granted in a race to the competitor possessing inferior advantages; or an additional weight or other hindrance imposed upon the one possessing superior advantages, in order to equalize, as much as possible, the chances of success; as, the handicap was five seconds, or ten pounds, and the like.

Handicap (n.) A race, for horses or men, or any contest of agility, strength, or skill, in which there is an allowance of time, distance, weight, or other advantage, to equalize the chances of the competitors.

Handicap (n.) An old game at cards.

Handicapped (imp. & p. p.) of Handicap

Handicapping (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Handicap

Handicap (v. t.) To encumber with a handicap in any contest; hence, in general, to place at disadvantage; as, the candidate was heavily handicapped.

Handicapper (n.) One who determines the conditions of a handicap.

Handicraft (n.) A trade requiring skill of hand; manual occupation; handcraft.

Handicraft (n.) A man who earns his living by handicraft; a handicraftsman.

-men (pl. ) of Handi-craftsman

Handi-craftsman (n.) A man skilled or employed in handcraft.

Handily (adv.) In a handy manner; skillfully; conveniently.

Handiness (n.) The quality or state of being handy.

Handiron (n.) See Andrion.

Handiwork (n.) Work done by the hands; hence, any work done personally.

Handkercher (n.) A handkerchief.

Handkerchief (n.) A piece of cloth, usually square and often fine and elegant, carried for wiping the face or hands.

Handkerchief (n.) A piece of cloth shaped like a handkerchief to be worn about the neck; a neckerchief; a neckcloth.

Handled (imp. & p. p.) of Handle

Handling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Handle

Handle (v. t.) To touch; to feel with the hand; to use or hold with the hand.

Handle (v. t.) To manage in using, as a spade or a musket; to wield; often, to manage skillfully.

Handle (v. t.) To accustom to the hand; to work upon, or take care of, with the hands.

Handle (v. t.) To receive and transfer; to have pass through one's hands; hence, to buy and sell; as, a merchant handles a variety of goods, or a large stock.

Handle (v. t.) To deal with; to make a business of.

Handle (v. t.) To treat; to use, well or ill.

Handle (v. t.) To manage; to control; to practice skill upon.

Handle (v. t.) To use or manage in writing or speaking; to treat, as a theme, an argument, or an objection.

Handle (v. i.) To use the hands.

Handle (n.) That part of vessels, instruments, etc., which is held in the hand when used or moved, as the haft of a sword, the knob of a door, the bail of a kettle, etc.

Handle (n.) That of which use is made; the instrument for effecting a purpose; a tool.

Handleable (a.) Capable of being handled.

Handless (a.) Without a hand.

Handling (n.) A touching, controlling, managing, using, etc., with the hand or hands, or as with the hands. See Handle, v. t.

Handling (v. t.) The mode of using the pencil or brush, etc.; style of touch.

Handmade (a.) Manufactured by hand; as, handmade shoes.

Handmaid (n.) Alt. of Handmaiden

Handmaiden (n.) A maid that waits at hand; a female servant or attendant.

Handsaw (n.) A saw used with one hand.

Handsel (n.) A sale, gift, or delivery into the hand of another; especially, a sale, gift, delivery, or using which is the first of a series, and regarded as on omen for the rest; a first installment; an earnest; as the first money received for the sale of goods in the morning, the first money taken at a shop newly opened, the first present sent to a young woman on her wedding day, etc.

Handsel (n.) Price; payment.

Handseled (imp. & p. p.) of Handsel

Handseled () of Handsel

Handseling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Handsel

Handselling () of Handsel

Handsel (n.) To give a handsel to.

Handsel (n.) To use or do for the first time, esp. so as to make fortunate or unfortunate; to try experimentally.

Handsome (superl.) Dexterous; skillful; handy; ready; convenient; -- applied to things as persons.

Handsome (superl.) Agreeable to the eye or to correct taste; having a pleasing appearance or expression; attractive; having symmetry and dignity; comely; -- expressing more than pretty, and less than beautiful; as, a handsome man or woman; a handsome garment, house, tree, horse.

Handsome (superl.) Suitable or fit in action; marked with propriety and ease; graceful; becoming; appropriate; as, a handsome style, etc.

Handsome (superl.) Evincing a becoming generosity or nobleness of character; liberal; generous.

Handsome (superl.) Ample; moderately large.

Hadsome (v. t.) To render handsome.

Handsomely (adv.) In a handsome manner.

Handsomely (adv.) Carefully; in shipshape style.

Handsomeness (n.) The quality of being handsome.

Handspike (n.) A bar or lever, generally of wood, used in a windlass or capstan, for heaving anchor, and, in modified forms, for various purposes.

Handspring (n.) A somersault made with the assistance of the hands placed upon the ground.

Hand-tight (a.) As tight as can be made by the hand.

Handwheel (n.) Any wheel worked by hand; esp., one the rim of which serves as the handle by which a valve, car brake, or other part is adjusted.

Hand-winged (a.) Having wings that are like hands in the structure and arrangement of their bones; -- said of bats. See Cheiroptera.

Handwriting (n.) The cast or form of writing peculiar to each hand or person; chirography.

Handwriting (n.) That which is written by hand; manuscript.

Handy (superl.) Performed by the hand.

Handy (superl.) Skillful in using the hand; dexterous; ready; adroit.

Handy (superl.) Ready to the hand; near; also, suited to the use of the hand; convenient; valuable for reference or use; as, my tools are handy; a handy volume.

Handy (superl.) Easily managed; obedient to the helm; -- said of a vessel.

Handyy-dandy (n.) A child's play, one child guessing in which closed hand the other holds some small object, winning the object if right and forfeiting an equivalent if wrong; hence, forfeit.

Handyfight (n.) A fight with the hands; boxing.

Handygripe (n.) Seizure by, or grasp of, the hand; also, close quarters in fighting.

Handystroke (n.) A blow with the hand.

Hand-work (n.) See Handiwork.

Hanged (imp. & p. p.) of Hang

Hung () of Hang

Hanging (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hang

Hang (v. i.) To suspend; to fasten to some elevated point without support from below; -- often used with up or out; as, to hang a coat on a hook; to hang up a sign; to hang out a banner.

Hang (v. i.) To fasten in a manner which will allow of free motion upon the point or points of suspension; -- said of a pendulum, a swing, a door, gate, etc.

Hang (v. i.) To fit properly, as at a proper angle (a part of an implement that is swung in using), as a scythe to its snath, or an ax to its helve.

Hang (v. i.) To put to death by suspending by the neck; -- a form of capital punishment; as, to hang a murderer.

Hang (v. i.) To cover, decorate, or furnish by hanging pictures trophies, drapery, and the like, or by covering with paper hangings; -- said of a wall, a room, etc.

Hang (v. i.) To paste, as paper hangings, on the walls of a room.

Hang (v. i.) To hold or bear in a suspended or inclined manner or position instead of erect; to droop; as, he hung his head in shame.

Hang (v. i.) To be suspended or fastened to some elevated point without support from below; to dangle; to float; to rest; to remain; to stay.

Hang (v. i.) To be fastened in such a manner as to allow of free motion on the point or points of suspension.

Hang (v. i.) To die or be put to death by suspension from the neck.

Hang (v. i.) To hold for support; to depend; to cling; -- usually with on or upon; as, this question hangs on a single point.

Hang (v. i.) To be, or be like, a suspended weight.

Hang (v. i.) To hover; to impend; to appear threateningly; -- usually with over; as, evils hang over the country.

Hang (v. i.) To lean or incline; to incline downward.

Hang (v. i.) To slope down; as, hanging grounds.

Hang (v. i.) To be undetermined or uncertain; to be in suspense; to linger; to be delayed.

Hang (n.) The manner in which one part or thing hangs upon, or is connected with, another; as, the hang of a scythe.

Hang (n.) Connection; arrangement; plan; as, the hang of a discourse.

Hang (n.) A sharp or steep declivity or slope.

Hangbird (n.) The Baltimore oriole (Icterus galbula); -- so called because its nest is suspended from the limb of a tree. See Baltimore oriole.

Hang-bies (pl. ) of Hang-by

Hang-by (n.) A dependent; a hanger-on; -- so called in contempt.

Hangdog (n.) A base, degraded person; a sneak; a gallows bird.

Hangdog (a.) Low; sneaking; ashamed.

Hanger (n.) One who hangs, or causes to be hanged; a hangman.

Hanger (n.) That by which a thing is suspended.

Hanger (n.) A strap hung to the girdle, by which a dagger or sword is suspended.

Hanger (n.) A part that suspends a journal box in which shafting runs. See Illust. of Countershaft.

Hanger (n.) A bridle iron.

Hanger (n.) That which hangs or is suspended, as a sword worn at the side; especially, in the 18th century, a short, curved sword.

Hanger (n.) A steep, wooded declivity.

Hangers-on (pl. ) of Hanger-on

Hanger-on (n.) One who hangs on, or sticks to, a person, place, or service; a dependent; one who adheres to others' society longer than he is wanted.

Hanging (a.) Requiring, deserving, or foreboding death by the halter.

Hanging (a.) Suspended from above; pendent; as, hanging shelves.

Hanging (a.) Adapted for sustaining a hanging object; as, the hanging post of a gate, the post which holds the hinges.

Hanging (n.) The act of suspending anything; the state of being suspended.

Hanging (n.) Death by suspension; execution by a halter.

Hanging (n.) That which is hung as lining or drapery for the walls of a room, as tapestry, paper, etc., or to cover or drape a door or window; -- used chiefly in the plural.

Hangmen (pl. ) of Hangman

Hangman (n.) One who hangs another; esp., one who makes a business of hanging; a public executioner; -- sometimes used as a term of reproach, without reference to office.

Hangmanship (n.) The office or character of a hangman.

Hangnail (n.) A small piece or silver of skin which hangs loose, near the root of finger nail.

Hangnest (n.) A nest that hangs like a bag or pocket.

Hangnest (n.) A bird which builds such a nest; a hangbird.

Hank (n.) A parcel consisting of two or more skeins of yarn or thread tied together.

Hank (n.) A rope or withe for fastening a gate.

Hank (n.) Hold; influence.

Hank (n.) A ring or eye of rope, wood, or iron, attached to the edge of a sail and running on a stay.

Hank (v. t.) To fasten with a rope, as a gate.

Hank (v. t.) To form into hanks.

Hankered (imp. & p. p.) of Hanker

Hankering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hanker

Hanker (v. i.) To long (for) with a keen appetite and uneasiness; to have a vehement desire; -- usually with for or after; as, to hanker after fruit; to hanker after the diversions of the town.

Hanker (v. i.) To linger in expectation or with desire.

Hankeringly (adv.) In a hankering manner.

Hankey-pankey (n.) Professional cant; the chatter of conjurers to divert attention from their tricks; hence, jugglery.

Hanoverian (a.) Of or pertaining to Hanover or its people, or to the House of Hanover in England.

Hanoverian (n.) A native or naturalized inhabitant of Hanover; one of the House of Hanover.

Han sa (n.) See 2d Hanse.

Hansard (n.) An official report of proceedings in the British Parliament; -- so called from the name of the publishers.

Hansard (n.) A merchant of one of the Hanse towns. See the Note under 2d Hanse.

Hanse (n.) That part of an elliptical or many-centered arch which has the shorter radius and immediately adjoins the impost.

Hanse (n.) An association; a league or confederacy.

Hanseatic (a.) Pertaining to the Hanse towns, or to their confederacy.

Hansel (n. & v.) See Handsel.

Hanselines (n.) A sort of breeches.

Hansom () Alt. of Hansom cab

Hansom cab () A light, low, two-wheeled covered carriage with the driver's seat elevated behind, the reins being passed over the top.

Han't () A contraction of have not, or has not, used in illiterate speech. In the United States the commoner spelling is hain't.

Hanuman (n.) See Hoonoomaun.

Hap (v. t.) To clothe; to wrap.

Hap (n.) A cloak or plaid.

Hap (n.) That which happens or comes suddenly or unexpectedly; also, the manner of occurrence or taking place; chance; fortune; accident; casual event; fate; luck; lot.

Hap (v. i.) To happen; to befall; to chance.

Hap'penny (n.) A half-penny.

Haphazard (n.) Extra hazard; chance; accident; random.

Hapless (a.) Without hap or luck; luckless; unfortunate; unlucky; unhappy; as, hapless youth; hapless maid.

Haplessly (adv.) In a hapless, unlucky manner.

Haplomi (n. pl.) An order of freshwater fishes, including the true pikes, cyprinodonts, and blindfishes.

Haplostemonous (a.) Having but one series of stamens, and that equal in number to the proper number of petals; isostemonous.

Haply (adv.) By hap, chance, luck, or accident; perhaps; it may be.

Happed (p. a.) Wrapped; covered; cloaked.

Happened (imp. & p. p.) of Happen

Happening (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Happen

Happen (v. i.) To come by chance; to come without previous expectation; to fall out.

Happen (v. i.) To take place; to occur.

Happily (adv.) By chance; peradventure; haply.

Happily (adv.) By good fortune; fortunately; luckily.

Happily (adv.) In a happy manner or state; in happy circumstances; as, he lived happily with his wife.

Happily (adv.) With address or dexterity; gracefully; felicitously; in a manner to success; with success.

Happiness (n.) Good luck; good fortune; prosperity.

Happiness (n.) An agreeable feeling or condition of the soul arising from good fortune or propitious happening of any kind; the possession of those circumstances or that state of being which is attended enjoyment; the state of being happy; contentment; joyful satisfaction; felicity; blessedness.

Happiness (n.) Fortuitous elegance; unstudied grace; -- used especially of language.

Happy (superl.) Favored by hap, luck, or fortune; lucky; fortunate; successful; prosperous; satisfying desire; as, a happy expedient; a happy effort; a happy venture; a happy omen.

Happy (superl.) Experiencing the effect of favorable fortune; having the feeling arising from the consciousness of well-being or of enjoyment; enjoying good of any kind, as peace, tranquillity, comfort; contented; joyous; as, happy hours, happy thoughts.

Happy (superl.) Dexterous; ready; apt; felicitous.

Hapuku (n.) A large and valuable food fish (Polyprion prognathus) of New Zealand. It sometimes weighs one hundred pounds or more.

Haquebut (n.) See Hagbut.

Hara-kiri (n.) Suicide, by slashing the abdomen, formerly practiced in Japan, and commanded by the government in the cases of disgraced officials; disembowelment; -- also written, but incorrectly, hari-kari.

Harangue (n.) A speech addressed to a large public assembly; a popular oration; a loud address a multitude; in a bad sense, a noisy or pompous speech; declamation; ranting.

Harangued (imp. & p. p.) of Harangue

Haranguing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harangue

Harangue (v. i.) To make an harangue; to declaim.

Harangue (v. t.) To address by an harangue.

Harangueful (a.) Full of harangue.

Haranguer (n.) One who harangues, or is fond of haranguing; a declaimer.

Harassed (imp. & p. p.) of Harass

Harassing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harass

Harass (v. t.) To fatigue; to tire with repeated and exhausting efforts; esp., to weary by importunity, teasing, or fretting; to cause to endure excessive burdens or anxieties; -- sometimes followed by out.

Harass (n.) Devastation; waste.

Harass (n.) Worry; harassment.

Harasser (n.) One who harasses.

Harassment (n.) The act of harassing, or state of being harassed; worry; annoyance; anxiety.

Harberous (a.) Harborous.

Harbinger (n.) One who provides lodgings; especially, the officer of the English royal household who formerly preceded the court when traveling, to provide and prepare lodgings.

Harbinger (n.) A forerunner; a precursor; a messenger.

Harbingered (imp. & p. p.) of Harbinger

Harbingering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harbinger

Harbinger (v. t.) To usher in; to be a harbinger of.

Harbor (n.) A station for rest and entertainment; a place of security and comfort; a refuge; a shelter.

Harbor (n.) Specif.: A lodging place; an inn.

Harbor (n.) The mansion of a heavenly body.

Harbor (n.) A portion of a sea, a lake, or other large body of water, either landlocked or artificially protected so as to be a place of safety for vessels in stormy weather; a port or haven.

Harbor (n.) A mixing box materials.

Harbored (imp. & p. p.) of Harbor

Harboring (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harbor

Harbor (n.) To afford lodging to; to enter as guest; to receive; to give a refuge to; indulge or cherish (a thought or feeling, esp. an ill thought).

Harbor (v. i.) To lodge, or abide for a time; to take shelter, as in a harbor.

Harborage (n.) Shelter; entertainment.

Harborer (n.) One who, or that which, harbors.

Harborless (a.) Without a harbor; shelterless.

Harbor master () An officer charged with the duty of executing the regulations respecting the use of a harbor.

Harborough () Alt. of Harbrough

Harbrough () A shelter.

Harborous (a.) Hospitable.

Hard (superl.) Not easily penetrated, cut, or separated into parts; not yielding to pressure; firm; solid; compact; -- applied to material bodies, and opposed to soft; as, hard wood; hard flesh; a hard apple.

Hard (superl.) Difficult, mentally or judicially; not easily apprehended, decided, or resolved; as a hard problem.

Hard (superl.) Difficult to accomplish; full of obstacles; laborious; fatiguing; arduous; as, a hard task; a disease hard to cure.

Hard (superl.) Difficult to resist or control; powerful.

Hard (superl.) Difficult to bear or endure; not easy to put up with or consent to; hence, severe; rigorous; oppressive; distressing; unjust; grasping; as, a hard lot; hard times; hard fare; a hard winter; hard conditions or terms.

Hard (superl.) Difficult to please or influence; stern; unyielding; obdurate; unsympathetic; unfeeling; cruel; as, a hard master; a hard heart; hard words; a hard character.

Hard (superl.) Not easy or agreeable to the taste; stiff; rigid; ungraceful; repelling; as, a hard style.

Hard (superl.) Rough; acid; sour, as liquors; as, hard cider.

Hard (superl.) Abrupt or explosive in utterance; not aspirated, sibilated, or pronounced with a gradual change of the organs from one position to another; -- said of certain consonants, as c in came, and g in go, as distinguished from the same letters in center, general, etc.

Hard (superl.) Wanting softness or smoothness of utterance; harsh; as, a hard tone.

Hard (superl.) Rigid in the drawing or distribution of the figures; formal; lacking grace of composition.

Hard (superl.) Having disagreeable and abrupt contrasts in the coloring or light and shade.

Hard (adv.) With pressure; with urgency; hence, diligently; earnestly.

Hard (adv.) With difficulty; as, the vehicle moves hard.

Hard (adv.) Uneasily; vexatiously; slowly.

Hard (adv.) So as to raise difficulties.

Hard (adv.) With tension or strain of the powers; violently; with force; tempestuously; vehemently; vigorously; energetically; as, to press, to blow, to rain hard; hence, rapidly; as, to run hard.

Hard (adv.) Close or near.

Hard (v. t.) To harden; to make hard.

Hard (n.) A ford or passage across a river or swamp.

Hardbake (n.) A sweetmeat of boiled brown sugar or molasses made with almonds, and flavored with orange or lemon juice, etc.

Hardbeam (n.) A tree of the genus Carpinus, of compact, horny texture; hornbeam.

Hardened (imp. & p. p.) of Harden

Hardening (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harden

Harden (v. t.) To make hard or harder; to make firm or compact; to indurate; as, to harden clay or iron.

Harden (v. t.) To accustom by labor or suffering to endure with constancy; to strengthen; to stiffen; to inure; also, to confirm in wickedness or shame; to make unimpressionable.

Harden (v. i.) To become hard or harder; to acquire solidity, or more compactness; as, mortar hardens by drying.

Harden (v. i.) To become confirmed or strengthened, in either a good or a bad sense.

Hardened (a.) Made hard, or compact; made unfeeling or callous; made obstinate or obdurate; confirmed in error or vice.

Hardener (n.) One who, or that which, hardens; specif., one who tempers tools.

Hardening (n.) Making hard or harder.

Hardening (n.) That which hardens, as a material used for converting the surface of iron into steel.

Harder (n.) A South African mullet, salted for food.

Harderian (a.) A term applied to a lachrymal gland on the inner side of the orbit of many animals which have a third eyelid, or nictitating membrane. See Nictitating membrane, under Nictitate.

Hard-favored (a.) Hard-featured; ill-looking; as, Vulcan was hard-favored.

Hardfavoredness (n.) Coarseness of features.

Hard-featured (a.) Having coarse, unattractive or stern features.

Hardfern (n.) A species of fern (Lomaria borealis), growing in Europe and Northwestern America.

Hard-fisted (a.) Having hard or strong hands; as, a hard-fisted laborer.

Hard-fisted (a.) Close-fisted; covetous; niggardly.

Hard-fought (a. Vigorously) contested; as, a hard-fought battle.

Hard grass () A name given to several different grasses, especially to the Roltbollia incurvata, and to the species of Aegilops, from one of which it is contended that wheat has been derived.

Hardhack (n.) A very astringent shrub (Spiraea tomentosa), common in pastures. The Potentilla fruticosa in also called by this name.

Hard-handed (a.) Having hard hands, as a manual laborer.

Hardhead (n.) Clash or collision of heads in contest.

Hardhead (n.) The menhaden. See Menhaden.

Hardhead (n.) Block's gurnard (Trigla gurnardus) of Europe.

Hardhead (n.) A California salmon; the steelhead.

Hardhead (n.) The gray whale.

Hardhead (n.) A coarse American commercial sponge (Spongia dura).

Hard-headed (a.) Having sound judgment; sagacious; shrewd.

Hard-hearted (a.) Unsympathetic; inexorable; cruel; pitiless.

Harddihead (n.) Hardihood.

Harddihood (n.) Boldness, united with firmness and constancy of mind; bravery; intrepidity; also, audaciousness; impudence.

Hardily (adv.) Same as Hardly.

Hardily (adv.) Boldly; stoutly; resolutely.

Hardiment (n.) Hardihood; boldness; courage; energetic action.

Hardiness (n.) Capability of endurance.

Hardiness (n.) Hardihood; boldness; firmness; assurance.

Hardiness (n.) Hardship; fatigue.

Hardish (a.) Somewhat hard.

Hard-labored (a.) Wrought with severe labor; elaborate; studied.

Hardly (adv.) In a hard or difficult manner; with difficulty.

Hardly (adv.) Unwillingly; grudgingly.

Hardly (adv.) Scarcely; barely; not guite; not wholly.

Hardly (adv.) Severely; harshly; roughly.

Hardly (adv.) Confidently; hardily.

Hardly (adv.) Certainly; surely; indeed.

Hard-mouthed (a.) Not sensible to the bit; not easily governed; as, a hard-mouthed horse.

Hardness (n.) The quality or state of being hard, literally or figuratively.

Hardness (n.) The cohesion of the particles on the surface of a body, determined by its capacity to scratch another, or be itself scratched;-measured among minerals on a scale of which diamond and talc form the extremes.

Hardness (n.) The peculiar quality exhibited by water which has mineral salts dissolved in it. Such water forms an insoluble compound with soap, and is hence unfit for washing purposes.

Hardock (n.) See Hordock.

Hardpan (n.) The hard substratum. Same as Hard pan, under Hard, a.

Hards (n. pl.) The refuse or coarse part of fiax; tow.

Hard-shell (a.) Unyielding; insensible to argument; uncompromising; strict.

Hardship (n.) That which is hard to hear, as toil, privation, injury, injustice, etc.

Hardspun (a.) Firmly twisted in spinning.

Hard-tack (n.) A name given by soldiers and sailors to a kind of hard biscuit or sea bread.

Hardtail (n.) See Jurel.

Hard-visaged (a.) Of a harsh or stern countenance; hard-featured.

Hardware (n.) Ware made of metal, as cutlery, kitchen utensils, and the like; ironmongery.

Hardwaremen (pl. ) of Hardwareman

Hardwareman (n.) One who makes, or deals in, hardware.

Hardy (a.) Bold; brave; stout; daring; resolu?e; intrepid.

Hardy (a.) Confident; full of assurance; in a bad sense, morally hardened; shameless.

Hardy (a.) Strong; firm; compact.

Hardy (a.) Inured to fatigue or hardships; strong; capable of endurance; as, a hardy veteran; a hardy mariner.

Hardy (a.) Able to withstand the cold of winter.

Hardy (n.) A blacksmith's fuller or chisel, having a square shank for insertion into a square hole in an anvil, called the hardy hole.

Hare (v. t.) To excite; to tease, or worry; to harry.

Hare (n.) A rodent of the genus Lepus, having long hind legs, a short tail, and a divided upper lip. It is a timid animal, moves swiftly by leaps, and is remarkable for its fecundity.

Hare (n.) A small constellation situated south of and under the foot of Orion; Lepus.

Harebell (n.) A small, slender, branching plant (Campanula rotundifolia), having blue bell-shaped flowers; also, Scilla nutans, which has similar flowers; -- called also bluebell.

Hare'brained' (a.) Wild; giddy; volatile; heedless.

Harefoot (n.) A long, narrow foot, carried (that is, produced or extending) forward; -- said of dogs.

Harefoot (n.) A tree (Ochroma Laqopus) of the West Indies, having the stamens united somewhat in the form of a hare's foot.

Hare-hearted (a.) Timorous; timid; easily frightened.

Harehound (n.) See Harrier.

Hareld (n.) The long-tailed duck.

Harelip (n.) A lip, commonly the upper one, having a fissure of perpendicular division like that of a hare.

Harem (n.) The apartments or portion of the house allotted to females in Mohammedan families.

Harem (n.) The family of wives and concubines belonging to one man, in Mohammedan countries; a seraglio.

Harengiform (a.) Herring-shaped.

Hare's-ear (n.) An umbelliferous plant (Bupleurum rotundifolium ); -- so named from the shape of its leaves.

Hare's-foot fern () A species of fern (Davallia Canariensis) with a soft, gray, hairy rootstock; -- whence the name.

Hare's-tail (n.) A kind of grass (Eriophorum vaginatum). See Cotton grass, under Cotton.

Harfang (n.) The snowy owl.

Hariali grass () The East Indian name of the Cynodon Dactylon; dog's-grass.

Haricot (n.) A ragout or stew of meat with beans and other vegetables.

Haricot (n.) The ripe seeds, or the unripe pod, of the common string bean (Phaseolus vulgaris), used as a vegetable. Other species of the same genus furnish different kinds of haricots.

Harier (n.) See Harrier.

Harikari (n.) See Hara-kiri.

Harioiation (n.) Prognostication; soothsaying.

Harish (a.) Like a hare.

Hark (v. i.) To listen; to hearken.

Harken (v. t. & i.) To hearken.

Harl (n.) A filamentous substance; especially, the filaments of flax or hemp.

Harl (n.) A barb, or barbs, of a fine large feather, as of a peacock or ostrich, -- used in dressing artificial flies.

Harle (n.) The red-breasted merganser.

Harlech group () A minor subdivision at the base of the Cambrian system in Wales.

Harlequin (n.) A buffoon, dressed in party-colored clothes, who plays tricks, often without speaking, to divert the bystanders or an audience; a merry-andrew; originally, a droll rogue of Italian comedy.

Harlequin (n. i.) To play the droll; to make sport by playing ludicrous tricks.

Harlequin (v. t.) Toremove or conjure away, as by a harlequin's trick.

Harlequinade (n.) A play or part of play in which the harlequin is conspicuous; the part of a harlequin.

Harlock (n.) Probably a corruption either of charlock or hardock.

Harlot (n.) A churl; a common man; a person, male or female, of low birth.

Harlot (n.) A person given to low conduct; a rogue; a cheat; a rascal.

Harlot (n.) A woman who prostitutes her body for hire; a prostitute; a common woman; a strumpet.

Harlot (a.) Wanton; lewd; low; base.

Harlot (v. i.) To play the harlot; to practice lewdness.

Harlotize (v. i.) To harlot.

Harlotry (n.) Ribaldry; buffoonery; a ribald story.

Harlotry (n.) The trade or practice of prostitution; habitual or customary lewdness.

Harlotry (n.) Anything meretricious; as, harlotry in art.

Harlotry (n.) A harlot; a strumpet; a baggage.

Harm (n.) Injury; hurt; damage; detriment; misfortune.

Harm (n.) That which causes injury, damage, or loss.

Harmed (imp. & p. p.) of Harm

Harming (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harm

Harm (n.) To hurt; to injure; to damage; to wrong.

Harmaline (n.) An alkaloid found in the plant Peganum harmala. It forms bitter, yellow salts.

Harmattan (n.) A dry, hot wind, prevailing on the Atlantic coast of Africa, in December, January, and February, blowing from the interior or Sahara. It is usually accompanied by a haze which obscures the sun.

Harmel (n.) A kind of rue (Ruta sylvestris) growing in India. At Lahore the seeds are used medicinally and for fumigation.

Harmful (a.) Full of harm; injurious; hurtful; mischievous.

Harmine (n.) An alkaloid accompanying harmaline (in the Peganum harmala), and obtained from it by oxidation. It is a white crystalline substance.

Harmless (a.) Free from harm; unhurt; as, to give bond to save another harmless.

Harmless (a.) Free from power or disposition to harm; innocent; inoffensive.

Harmonic (a.) Alt. of Harmonical

Harmonical (a.) Concordant; musical; consonant; as, harmonic sounds.

Harmonical (a.) Relating to harmony, -- as melodic relates to melody; harmonious; esp., relating to the accessory sounds or overtones which accompany the predominant and apparent single tone of any string or sonorous body.

Harmonical (a.) Having relations or properties bearing some resemblance to those of musical consonances; -- said of certain numbers, ratios, proportions, points, lines. motions, and the like.

Harmonic (n.) A musical note produced by a number of vibrations which is a multiple of the number producing some other; an overtone. See Harmonics.

Harmonica (n.) A musical instrument, consisting of a series of hemispherical glasses which, by touching the edges with the dampened finger, give forth the tones.

Harmonica (n.) A toy instrument of strips of glass or metal hung on two tapes, and struck with hammers.

Har monically (adv.) In an harmonical manner; harmoniously.

Har monically (adv.) In respect to harmony, as distinguished from melody; as, a passage harmonically correct.

Har monically (adv.) In harmonical progression.

Harmonicon (n.) A small, flat, wind instrument of music, in which the notes are produced by the vibration of free metallic reeds.

Harmonics (n.) The doctrine or science of musical sounds.

Harmonics (n.) Secondary and less distinct tones which accompany any principal, and apparently simple, tone, as the octave, the twelfth, the fifteenth, and the seventeenth. The name is also applied to the artificial tones produced by a string or column of air, when the impulse given to it suffices only to make a part of the string or column vibrate; overtones.

Harmonious (a.) Adapted to each other; having parts proportioned to each other; symmetrical.

Harmonious (a.) Acting together to a common end; agreeing in action or feeling; living in peace and friendship; as, an harmonious family.

Harmonious (a.) Vocally or musically concordant; agreeably consonant; symphonious.

Harmoniphon (n.) An obsolete wind instrument with a keyboard, in which the sound, which resembled the oboe, was produced by the vibration of thin metallic plates, acted upon by blowing through a tube.

Harmonist (n.) One who shows the agreement or harmony of corresponding passages of different authors, as of the four evangelists.

Harmonist (n.) One who understands the principles of harmony or is skillful in applying them in composition; a musical composer.

Harmonist (n.) Alt. of Harmonite

Harmonite (n.) One of a religious sect, founded in Wurtemburg in the last century, composed of followers of George Rapp, a weaver. They had all their property in common. In 1803, a portion of this sect settled in Pennsylvania and called the village thus established, Harmony.

Harmonium (n.) A musical instrument, resembling a small organ and especially designed for church music, in which the tones are produced by forcing air by means of a bellows so as to cause the vibration of free metallic reeds. It is now made with one or two keyboards, and has pedals and stops.

Harmonization (n.) The act of harmonizing.

Harmonized (imp. & p. p.) of Harmonize

Harmonizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harmonize

Harmonize (v. i.) To agree in action, adaptation, or effect on the mind; to agree in sense or purport; as, the parts of a mechanism harmonize.

Harmonize (v. i.) To be in peace and friendship, as individuals, families, or public organizations.

Harmonize (v. i.) To agree in vocal or musical effect; to form a concord; as, the tones harmonize perfectly.

Harmonize (v. t.) To adjust in fit proportions; to cause to agree; to show the agreement of; to reconcile the apparent contradiction of.

Harmonize (v. t.) To accompany with harmony; to provide with parts, as an air, or melody.

Harmonizer (n.) One who harmonizes.

Harmonometer (n.) An instrument for measuring the harmonic relations of sounds. It is often a monochord furnished with movable bridges.

Harmonies (pl. ) of Harmony

Harmony (n.) The just adaptation of parts to each other, in any system or combination of things, or in things, or things intended to form a connected whole; such an agreement between the different parts of a design or composition as to produce unity of effect; as, the harmony of the universe.

Harmony (n.) Concord or agreement in facts, opinions, manners, interests, etc.; good correspondence; peace and friendship; as, good citizens live in harmony.

Harmony (n.) A literary work which brings together or arranges systematically parallel passages of historians respecting the same events, and shows their agreement or consistency; as, a harmony of the Gospels.

Harmony (n.) A succession of chords according to the rules of progression and modulation.

Harmony (n.) The science which treats of their construction and progression.

Harmony (n.) See Harmonic suture, under Harmonic.

Harmost (n.) A governor or prefect appointed by the Spartans in the cities subjugated by them.

Harmotome (n.) A hydrous silicate of alumina and baryta, occurring usually in white cruciform crystals; cross-stone.

Harness (n.) Originally, the complete dress, especially in a military sense, of a man or a horse; hence, in general, armor.

Harness (n.) The equipment of a draught or carriage horse, for drawing a wagon, coach, chaise, etc.; gear; tackling.

Harness (n.) The part of a loom comprising the heddles, with their means of support and motion, by which the threads of the warp are alternately raised and depressed for the passage of the shuttle.

Harnessed (imp. & p. p.) of Harness

Harnessing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harness

Harness (v. t.) To dress in armor; to equip with armor for war, as a horseman; to array.

Harness (v. t.) Fig.: To equip or furnish for defense.

Harness (v. t.) To make ready for draught; to equip with harness, as a horse. Also used figuratively.

Harness cask () A tub lashed to a vessel's deck and containing salted provisions for daily use; -- called also harness tub.

Harnesser (n.) One who harnesses.

Harns (n. pl.) The brains.

Harp (n.) A musical instrument consisting of a triangular frame furnished with strings and sometimes with pedals, held upright, and played with the fingers.

Harp (n.) A constellation; Lyra, or the Lyre.

Harp (n.) A grain sieve.

Harped (imp. & p. p.) of Harp

Harping (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harp

Harp (n.) To play on the harp.

Harp (n.) To dwell on or recur to a subject tediously or monotonously in speaking or in writing; to refer to something repeatedly or continually; -- usually with on or upon.

Harp (v. t.) To play on, as a harp; to play (a tune) on the harp; to develop or give expression to by skill and art; to sound forth as from a harp; to hit upon.

Harpa (n.) A genus of marine univalve shells; the harp shells; -- so called from the form of the shells, and their ornamental ribs.

Harpagon (n.) A grappling iron.

Harper (n.) A player on the harp; a minstrel.

Harper (n.) A brass coin bearing the emblem of a harp, -- formerly current in Ireland.

Harping (a.) Pertaining to the harp; as, harping symphonies.

Harping iron () A harpoon.

Harpings (n. pl.) The fore parts of the wales, which encompass the bow of a vessel, and are fastened to the stem.

Harpist (n.) A player on the harp; a harper.

Harpoon (n.) A spear or javelin used to strike and kill large fish, as whales; a harping iron. It consists of a long shank, with a broad, fiat, triangular head, sharpened at both edges, and is thrown by hand, or discharged from a gun.

Harpooned (imp. & p. p.) of Harpoon

Harpooning (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harpoon

Harpoon (v. t.) To strike, catch, or kill with a harpoon.

Harpooneer (n.) An harpooner.

Harpooner (n.) One who throws the harpoon.

Harpress (n.) A female harper.

Harpsichon (n.) A harpsichord.

Harpsichord (n.) A harp-shaped instrument of music set horizontally on legs, like the grand piano, with strings of wire, played by the fingers, by means of keys provided with quills, instead of hammers, for striking the strings. It is now superseded by the piano.

Harpies (pl. ) of Harpy

Harpy (n.) A fabulous winged monster, ravenous and filthy, having the face of a woman and the body of a vulture, with long claws, and the face pale with hunger. Some writers mention two, others three.

Harpy (n.) One who is rapacious or ravenous; an extortioner.

Harpy (n.) The European moor buzzard or marsh harrier (Circus aeruginosus).

Harpy (n.) A large and powerful, double-crested, short-winged American eagle (Thrasaetus harpyia). It ranges from Texas to Brazil.

Harquebus (n.) Alt. of Harquebuse

Harquebuse (n.) A firearm with match holder, trigger, and tumbler, made in the second half of the 15th century. the barrel was about forty inches long. A form of the harquebus was subsequently called arquebus with matchlock.

Harrage (v. t.) To harass; to plunder from.

Harre (n.) A hinge.

Harridan (n.) A worn-out strumpet; a vixenish woman; a hag.

Harrier (n.) One of a small breed of hounds, used for hunting hares.

Harrier (n.) One who harries.

Harrier (n.) One of several species of hawks or buzzards of the genus Circus which fly low and harry small animals or birds, -- as the European marsh harrier (Circus aerunginosus), and the hen harrier (C. cyaneus).

Harrow (n.) An implement of agriculture, usually formed of pieces of timber or metal crossing each other, and set with iron or wooden teeth. It is drawn over plowed land to level it and break the clods, to stir the soil and make it fine, or to cover seed when sown.

Harrow (n.) An obstacle formed by turning an ordinary harrow upside down, the frame being buried.

Harrowed (imp. & p. p.) of Harrow

Harrowing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harrow

Harrow (n.) To draw a harrow over, as for the purpose of breaking clods and leveling the surface, or for covering seed; as, to harrow land.

Harrow (n.) To break or tear, as with a harrow; to wound; to lacerate; to torment or distress; to vex.

Harrow (interj.) Help! Halloo! An exclamation of distress; a call for succor;-the ancient Norman hue and cry.

Harrow (v. t.) To pillage; to harry; to oppress.

Harrower (n.) One who harrows.

Harrower (n.) One who harries.

Harried (imp. & p. p.) of Harry

Harrying (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harry

Harry (v. t.) To strip; to lay waste; as, the Northmen came several times and harried the land.

Harry (v. t.) To agitate; to worry; to harrow; to harass.

Harry (v. i.) To make a predatory incursion; to plunder or lay waste.

Harsh (a.) Rough; disagreeable; grating

Harsh (a.) disagreeable to the touch.

Harsh (a.) disagreeable to the taste.

Harsh (a.) disagreeable to the ear.

Harsh (a.) Unpleasant and repulsive to the sensibilities; austere; crabbed; morose; abusive; abusive; severe; rough.

Harsh (a.) Having violent contrasts of color, or of light and shade; lacking in harmony.

Harshly (adv.) In a harsh manner; gratingly; roughly; rudely.

Harshness (n.) The quality or state of being harsh.

Harslet (n.) See Haslet.

Hart (n.) A stag; the male of the red deer. See the Note under Buck.

Hartbeest (n.) A large South African antelope (Alcelaphus caama), formerly much more abundant than it is now. The face and legs are marked with black, the rump with white.

Harten (v. t.) To hearten; to encourage; to incite.

Hartford (n.) The Hartford grape, a variety of grape first raised at Hartford, Connecticut, from the Northern fox grape. Its large dark-colored berries ripen earlier than those of most other kinds.

Harts clover () Melilot or sweet clover. See Melilot.

Hart's-ear (n.) An Asiatic species of Cacalia (C. Kleinia), used medicinally in India.

Hartshorn (n.) The horn or antler of the hart, or male red deer.

Hartshorn (n.) Spirits of hartshorn (see below); volatile salts.

Hart-tongue (n.) A common British fern (Scolopendrium vulgare), rare in America.

Hart-tongue (n.) A West Indian fern, the Polypodium Phyllitidis of Linnaeus. It is also found in Florida.

Hartwort (n.) A coarse umbelliferous plant of Europe (Tordylium maximum).

Harum-scarum (v. t.) Wild; giddy; flighty; rash; thoughtless.

Haruspication (n.) See Haruspicy.

Haruspice (n.) A diviner of ancient Rome. Same as Aruspice.

Haruspicy (n.) The art or practices of haruspices. See Aruspicy.

Harvest (n.) The gathering of a crop of any kind; the ingathering of the crops; also, the season of gathering grain and fruits, late summer or early autumn.

Harvest (n.) That which is reaped or ready to be reaped or gath//ed; a crop, as of grain (wheat, maize, etc.), or fruit.

Harvest (n.) The product or result of any exertion or labor; gain; reward.

Harvested (imp. & p. p.) of Harvest

Harvesting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Harvest

Harvest (v. t.) To reap or gather, as any crop.

Harvester (n.) One who harvests; a machine for cutting and gathering grain; a reaper.

Harvester (n.) A harvesting ant.

Harvest-home (n.) The gathering and bringing home of the harvest; the time of harvest.

Harvest-home (n.) The song sung by reapers at the feast made at the close of the harvest; the feast itself.

Harvest-home (n.) A service of thanksgiving, at harvest time, in the Church of England and in the Protestant Episcopal Church in the United States.

Harvest-home (n.) The opportunity of gathering treasure.

Harvesting () a. & n., from Harvest, v. t.

Harvestless (a.) Without harvest; lacking in crops; barren.

Harvestmen (pl. ) of Harvestman

Harvestman (n.) A man engaged in harvesting.

Harvestman (n.) See Daddy longlegs, 1.

Harvestry (n.) The act of harvesting; also, that which is harvested.

Hary (v. t.) To draw; to drag; to carry off by violence.

Has () 3d pers. sing. pres. of Have.

Hasard (n.) Hazard.

Hase (v. t.) See Haze, v. t.

Hash (n.) That which is hashed or chopped up; meat and vegetables, especially such as have been already cooked, chopped into small pieces and mixed.

Hash (n.) A new mixture of old matter; a second preparation or exhibition.

Hashed (imp. & p. p.) of Hash

Hashing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hash

Hash (n.) To /hop into small pieces; to mince and mix; as, to hash meat.

Hasheesh (n.) Alt. of Hashish

Hashish (n.) A slightly acrid gum resin produced by the common hemp (Cannabis saltiva), of the variety Indica, when cultivated in a warm climate; also, the tops of the plant, from which the resinous product is obtained. It is narcotic, and has long been used in the East for its intoxicating effect. See Bhang, and Ganja.

Hask (n.) A basket made of rushes or flags, as for carrying fish.

Haslet (n.) The edible viscera, as the heart, liver, etc., of a beast, esp. of a hog.

Hasp (n.) A clasp, especially a metal strap permanently fast at one end to a staple or pin, while the other passes over a staple, and is fastened by a padlock or a pin; also, a metallic hook for fastening a door.

Hasp (n.) A spindle to wind yarn, thread, or silk on.

Hasp (n.) An instrument for cutting the surface of grass land; a scarifier.

Hasped (imp. & p. p.) of Hasp

Hasping (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hasp

Hasp (v. t.) To shut or fasten with a hasp.

Hassock (n.) A rank tuft of bog grass; a tussock.

Hassock (n.) A small stuffed cushion or footstool, for kneeling on in church, or for home use.

Hast () 2d pers. sing. pres. of. Have, contr. of havest.

Hastate (n.) Alt. of Hastated

Hastated (n.) Shaped like the head of a halberd; triangular, with the basal angles or lobes spreading; as, a hastate leaf.

Haste (n.) Celerity of motion; speed; swiftness; dispatch; expedition; -- applied only to voluntary beings, as men and other animals.

Haste (n.) The state of being urged or pressed by business; hurry; urgency; sudden excitement of feeling or passion; precipitance; vehemence.

Hasted (imp. & p. p.) of Haste

Hasting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Haste

Haste (n.) To hasten; to hurry.

Hastened (imp. & p. p.) of Hasten

Hastening (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hasten

Hasten (v. t.) To press; to drive or urge forward; to push on; to precipitate; to accelerate the movement of; to expedite; to hurry.

Hasten (v. i.) To move celerity; to be rapid in motion; to act speedily or quickly; to go quickly.

Hastener (n.) One who hastens.

Hastener (n.) That which hastens; especially, a stand or reflector used for confining the heat of the fire to meat while roasting before it.

Hastif (a.) Hasty.

Hastile (a.) Same as Hastate.

Hastily (adv.) In haste; with speed or quickness; speedily; nimbly.

Hastily (adv.) Without due reflection; precipitately; rashly.

Hastily (adv.) Passionately; impatiently.

Hastiness (n.) The quality or state of being hasty; haste; precipitation; rashness; quickness of temper.

Hastings (v.) Early fruit or vegetables; especially, early pease.

Hastings sands () The lower group of the Wealden formation; -- so called from its development around Hastings, in Sussex, England.

Hastive (n.) Forward; early; -- said of fruits.

Hasty (n.) Involving haste; done, made, etc., in haste; as, a hasty sketch.

Hasty (n.) Demanding haste or immediate action.

Hasty (n.) Moving or acting with haste or in a hurry; hurrying; hence, acting without deliberation; precipitate; rash; easily excited; eager.

Hasty (n.) Made or reached without deliberation or due caution; as, a hasty conjecture, inference, conclusion, etc., a hasty resolution.

Hasty (n.) Proceeding from, or indicating, a quick temper.

Hasty (n.) Forward; early; first ripe.

Hasty pudding () A thick batter pudding made of Indian meal stirred into boiling water; mush.

Hasty pudding () A batter or pudding made of flour or oatmeal, stirred into boiling water or milk.

Hat (a.) Hot.

Hat () sing. pres. of Hote to be called. Cf.

Hat (n.) A covering for the head; esp., one with a crown and brim, made of various materials, and worn by men or women for protecting the head from the sun or weather, or for ornament.

Hatable (a.) Capable of being, or deserving to be, hated; odious; detestable.

Hatband (n.) A band round the crown of a hat; sometimes, a band of black cloth, crape, etc., worn as a badge of mourning.

Hatbox (n.) A box for a hat.

Hatched (imp. & p. p.) of Hatch

Hatching (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hatch

Hatch (v. t.) To cross with lines in a peculiar manner in drawing and engraving. See Hatching.

Hatch (v. t.) To cross; to spot; to stain; to steep.

Hatch (v. t.) To produce, as young, from an egg or eggs by incubation, or by artificial heat; to produce young from (eggs); as, the young when hatched.

Hatch (v. t.) To contrive or plot; to form by meditation, and bring into being; to originate and produce; to concoct; as, to hatch mischief; to hatch heresy.

Hatch (v. i.) To produce young; -- said of eggs; to come forth from the egg; -- said of the young of birds, fishes, insects, etc.

Hatch (n.) The act of hatching.

Hatch (n.) Development; disclosure; discovery.

Hatch (n.) The chickens produced at once or by one incubation; a brood.

Hatch (n.) A door with an opening over it; a half door, sometimes set with spikes on the upper edge.

Hatch (n.) A frame or weir in a river, for catching fish.

Hatch (n.) A flood gate; a a sluice gate.

Hatch (n.) A bedstead.

Hatch (n.) An opening in the deck of a vessel or floor of a warehouse which serves as a passageway or hoistway; a hatchway; also; a cover or door, or one of the covers used in closing such an opening.

Hatch (n.) An opening into, or in search of, a mine.

Hatch (v. t.) To close with a hatch or hatches.

Hatch-boat (n.) A vessel whose deck consists almost wholly of movable hatches; -- used mostly in the fisheries.

Hatchel (n.) An instrument with long iron teeth set in a board, for cleansing flax or hemp from the tow, hards, or coarse part; a kind of large comb; -- called also hackle and heckle.

Hatcheled (imp. & p. p.) of Hatchel

Hatchelled () of Hatchel

Hatcheling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hatchel

Hatchelling () of Hatchel

Hatchel (n.) To draw through the teeth of a hatchel, as flax or hemp, so as to separate the coarse and refuse parts from the fine, fibrous parts.

Hatchel (n.) To tease; to worry; to torment.

Hatcheler (n.) One who uses a hatchel.

Hatcher (n.) One who hatches, or that which hatches; a hatching apparatus; an incubator.

Hatcher (n.) One who contrives or originates; a plotter.

Hatchery (n.) A house for hatching fish, etc.

Hatchet (n.) A small ax with a short handle, to be used with one hand.

Hatchet (n.) Specifically, a tomahawk.

Hatchettine (n.) Alt. of Hatchettite

Hatchettite (n.) Mineral t/ low; a waxy or spermaceti-like substance, commonly of a greenish yellow color.

Hatching (n.) A mode of execution in engraving, drawing, and miniature painting, in which shading is produced by lines crossing each other at angles more or less acute; -- called also crosshatching.

Hatchment (n.) A sort of panel, upon which the arms of a deceased person are temporarily displayed, -- usually on the walls of his dwelling. It is lozenge-shaped or square, but is hung cornerwise. It is used in England as a means of giving public notification of the death of the deceased, his or her rank, whether married, widower, widow, etc. Called also achievement.

Hatchment (n.) A sword or other mark of the profession of arms; in general, a mark of dignity.

Hatchure (n.) Same as Hachure.

Hatchway (n.) A square or oblong opening in a deck or floor, affording passage from one deck or story to another; the entrance to a cellar.

Hated (imp. & p. p.) of Hate

Hating (p. pr. & pr. & vb. n.) of Hate

Hate (n.) To have a great aversion to, with a strong desire that evil should befall the person toward whom the feeling is directed; to dislike intensely; to detest; as, to hate one's enemies; to hate hypocrisy.

Hate (n.) To be very unwilling; followed by an infinitive, or a substantive clause with that; as, to hate to get into debt; to hate that anything should be wasted.

Hate (n.) To love less, relatively.

Hate (v.) Strong aversion coupled with desire that evil should befall the person toward whom the feeling is directed; as exercised toward things, intense dislike; hatred; detestation; -- opposed to love.

Hateful (a.) Manifesting hate or hatred; malignant; malevolent.

Hateful (a.) Exciting or deserving great dislike, aversion, or disgust; odious.

Hatel (a.) Hateful; detestable.

Hater (n.) One who hates.

Hath (3d pers. sing. pres.) Has.

Hatless (a.) Having no hat.

Hatrack (n.) A hatstand; hattree.

Hatred (n.) Strong aversion; intense dislike; hate; an affection of the mind awakened by something regarded as evil.

Hatstand (n.) A stand of wood or iron, with hooks or pegs upon which to hang hats, etc.

Hatte () pres. & imp. sing. & pl. of Hote, to be called. See Hote.

Hatted (a.) Covered with a hat.

Hatter (v. t.) To tire or worry; -- out.

Hatter (n.) One who makes or sells hats.

Hatteria (n.) A New Zealand lizard, which, in anatomical character, differs widely from all other existing lizards. It is the only living representative of the order Rhynchocephala, of which many Mesozoic fossil species are known; -- called also Sphenodon, and Tuatera.

Hatting (n.) The business of making hats; also, stuff for hats.

Hatti-sherif (n.) A irrevocable Turkish decree countersigned by the sultan.

Hattree (n.) A hatstand.

Haubergeon (n.) See Habergeon.

Hauberk (v. t.) A coat of mail; especially, the long coat of mail of the European Middle Ages, as contrasted with the habergeon, which is shorter and sometimes sleeveless. By old writers it is often used synonymously with habergeon. See Habergeon.

Hauerite (n.) Native sulphide of manganese a reddish brown or brownish black mineral.

Haugh (n.) A low-lying meadow by the side of a river.

Haught (a.) High; elevated; hence, haughty; proud.

Haughtily (adv.) In a haughty manner; arrogantly.

Haughtiness (n.) The quality of being haughty; disdain; arrogance.

Haughty (superl.) High; lofty; bold.

Haughty (superl.) Disdainfully or contemptuously proud; arrogant; overbearing.

Haughty (superl.) Indicating haughtiness; as, a haughty carriage.

Hauled (imp. & p. p.) of Haul

Hauling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Haul

Haul (v. t.) To pull or draw with force; to drag.

Haul (v. t.) To transport by drawing, as with horses or oxen; as, to haul logs to a sawmill.

Haul (v. i.) To change the direction of a ship by hauling the wind. See under Haul, v. t.

Haul (v. t.) To pull apart, as oxen sometimes do when yoked.

Haul (n.) A pulling with force; a violent pull.

Haul (n.) A single draught of a net; as, to catch a hundred fish at a haul.

Haul (n.) That which is caught, taken, or gained at once, as by hauling a net.

Haul (n.) Transportation by hauling; the distance through which anything is hauled, as freight in a railroad car; as, a long haul or short haul.

Haul (n.) A bundle of about four hundred threads, to be tarred.

Haulage (n.) Act of hauling; as, the haulage of cars by an engine; charge for hauling.

Hauler (n.) One who hauls.

Haulm (n.) The denuded stems or stalks of such crops as buckwheat and the cereal grains, beans, etc.; straw.

Haulm (n.) A part of a harness; a hame.

Hauls (n.) See Hals.

Haulse (v.) See Halse.

Hault (a.) Lofty; haughty.

Haum (n.) See Haulm, stalk.

Haunce (v. t.) To enhance.

Haunch (n.) The hip; the projecting region of the lateral parts of the pelvis and the hip joint; the hind part.

Haunch (n.) Of meats: The leg and loin taken together; as, a haunch of venison.

Haunched (a.) Having haunches.

Haunted (imp. & p. p.) of Haunt

Haunting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Haunt

Haunt (v. t.) To frequent; to resort to frequently; to visit pertinaciously or intrusively; to intrude upon.

Haunt (v. t.) To inhabit or frequent as a specter; to visit as a ghost or apparition.

Haunt (v. t.) To practice; to devote one's self to.

Haunt (v. t.) To accustom; to habituate.

Haunt (v. i.) To persist in staying or visiting.

Haunt (n.) A place to which one frequently resorts; as, drinking saloons are the haunts of tipplers; a den is the haunt of wild beasts.

Haunt (n.) The habit of resorting to a place.

Haunt (n.) Practice; skill.

Haunted (a.) Inhabited by, or subject to the visits of, apparitions; frequented by a ghost.

Haunter (n.) One who, or that which, haunts.

Haurient (a.) In pale, with the head in chief; -- said of the figure of a fish, as if rising for air.

Hausen (n.) A large sturgeon (Acipenser huso) from the region of the Black Sea. It is sometimes twelve feet long.

Hausse (n.) A kind of graduated breech sight for a small arm, or a cannon.

Haustellata (n. pl.) An artificial division of insects, including all those with a sucking proboscis.

Haustellate (a.) Provided with a haustellum, or sucking proboscis.

Haustellate (n.) One of the Haustellata.

Haustella (pl. ) of Haustellum

Haustellum (n.) The sucking proboscis of various insects. See Lepidoptera, and Diptera.

Haustoria (pl. ) of Haustorium

Haustorium (n.) One of the suckerlike rootlets of such plants as the dodder and ivy.

Haut (a.) Haughty.

Hautboy (n.) A wind instrument, sounded through a reed, and similar in shape to the clarinet, but with a thinner tone. Now more commonly called oboe. See Illust. of Oboe.

Hautboy (n.) A sort of strawberry (Fragaria elatior).

Hautboyist (n.) A player on the hautboy.

Hautein (a.) Haughty; proud.

Hautein (a.) High; -- said of the voice or flight of birds.

Hauteur (n.) Haughty manner or spirit; haughtiness; pride; arrogance.

Hautgout (n.) High relish or flavor; high seasoning.

Hautpas (n.) A raised part of the floor of a large room; a platform for a raised table or throne. See Dais.

Hauynite (n.) A blue isometric mineral, characteristic of some volcani/ rocks. It is a silicate of alumina, lime, and soda, with sulphate of lime.

Havana (a.) Of or pertaining to Havana, the capital of the island of Cuba; as, an Havana cigar

Havana (n.) An Havana cigar.

Havanese (a.) Of or pertaining to Havana, in Cuba.

Havanese (n. sing. & pl.) A native or inhabitant, or the people, of Havana.

Had (imp. & p. p.) of Have

Having (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Have

have (Indic. present) of Have

hast () of Have

has () of Have

have () of Have

Have (v. t.) To hold in possession or control; to own; as, he has a farm.

Have (v. t.) To possess, as something which appertains to, is connected with, or affects, one.

Have (v. t.) To accept possession of; to take or accept.

Have (v. t.) To get possession of; to obtain; to get.

Have (v. t.) To cause or procure to be; to effect; to exact; to desire; to require.

Have (v. t.) To bear, as young; as, she has just had a child.

Have (v. t.) To hold, regard, or esteem.

Have (v. t.) To cause or force to go; to take.

Have (v. t.) To take or hold (one's self); to proceed promptly; -- used reflexively, often with ellipsis of the pronoun; as, to have after one; to have at one or at a thing, i. e., to aim at one or at a thing; to attack; to have with a companion.

Have (v. t.) To be under necessity or obligation; to be compelled; followed by an infinitive.

Have (v. t.) To understand.

Have (v. t.) To put in an awkward position; to have the advantage of; as, that is where he had him.

Haveless (a.) Having little or nothing.

Havelock (n.) A light cloth covering for the head and neck, used by soldiers as a protection from sunstroke.

Haven (n.) A bay, recess, or inlet of the sea, or the mouth of a river, which affords anchorage and shelter for shipping; a harbor; a port.

Haven (n.) A place of safety; a shelter; an asylum.

Haven (v. t.) To shelter, as in a haven.

Havenage (n.) Harbor dues; port dues.

Havened (p. a.) Sheltered in a haven.

Havener (n.) A harbor master.

Haver (n.) A possessor; a holder.

Haver (n.) The oat; oats.

Haver (v. i.) To maunder; to talk foolishly; to chatter.

Haversack (n.) A bag for oats or oatmeal.

Haversack (n.) A bag or case, usually of stout cloth, in which a soldier carries his rations when on a march; -- distinguished from knapsack.

Haversack (n.) A gunner's case or bag used carry cartridges from the ammunition chest to the piece in loading.

Haversian (a.) Pertaining to, or discovered by, Clopton Havers, an English physician of the seventeenth century.

Havildar (n.) In the British Indian armies, a noncommissioned officer of native soldiers, corresponding to a sergeant.

Having (n.) Possession; goods; estate.

Havior (n.) Behavior; demeanor.

Havoc (n.) Wide and general destruction; devastation; waste.

Havoc (v. t.) To devastate; to destroy; to lay waste.

Havoc (n.) A cry in war as the signal for indiscriminate slaughter.

Haw (n.) A hedge; an inclosed garden or yard.

Haw (n.) The fruit of the hawthorn.

Haw (n.) The third eyelid, or nictitating membrane. See Nictitating membrane, under Nictitate.

Haw (n.) An intermission or hesitation of speech, with a sound somewhat like haw! also, the sound so made.

Haw (v. i.) To stop, in speaking, with a sound like haw; to speak with interruption and hesitation.

Hawed (imp. & p. p.) of Haw

Hawing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Haw

Haw (v. i.) To turn to the near side, or toward the driver; -- said of cattle or a team: a word used by teamsters in guiding their teams, and most frequently in the imperative. See Gee.

Haw (v. t.) To cause to turn, as a team, to the near side, or toward the driver; as, to haw a team of oxen.

Hawaiian (a.) Belonging to Hawaii or the Sandwich Islands, or to the people of Hawaii.

Hawaiian (n.) A native of Hawaii.

Hawebake (n.) Probably, the baked berry of the hawthorn tree, that is, coarse fare. See 1st Haw, 2.

Hawfinch (n.) The common European grosbeak (Coccothraustes vulgaris); -- called also cherry finch, and coble.

Haw-haw (n.) See Ha-ha.

Hawhaw (v. i.) To laugh boisterously.

Hawk (n.) One of numerous species and genera of rapacious birds of the family Falconidae. They differ from the true falcons in lacking the prominent tooth and notch of the bill, and in having shorter and less pointed wings. Many are of large size and grade into the eagles. Some, as the goshawk, were formerly trained like falcons. In a more general sense the word is not infrequently applied, also, to true falcons, as the sparrow hawk, pigeon hawk, duck hawk, and prairie hawk.

Hawked (imp. & p. p.) of Hawk

Hawking (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Hawk

Hawk (v. i.) To catch, or attempt to catch, birds by means of hawks trained for the purpose, and let loose on the prey; to practice falconry.

Hawk (v. i.) To make an attack while on the wing; to soar and strike like a hawk; -- generally with at; as, to hawk at flies.

Hawk (v. i.) To clear the throat with an audible sound by forcing an expiratory current of air through the narrow passage between the depressed soft palate and the root of the tongue, thus aiding in the removal of foreign substances.

Hawk (v. t.) To raise by hawking, as phlegm.

Hawk (n.) An effort to force up phlegm from the throat, accompanied with noise.

Hawk (v. t.) To offer for sale by outcry in the street; to carry (merchandise) about from place to place for sale; to peddle; as, to hawk goods or pamphlets.

Hawk (n.) A small board, with a handle on the under side, to hold mortar.

Hawkbill (n.) A sea turtle (Eretmochelys imbricata), which yields the best quality of tortoise shell; -- called also caret.

Hawkbit (n.) The fall dandelion (Leontodon autumnale).

Hawked (a.) Curved like a hawk's bill; crooked.

Hawker (n.) One who sells wares by crying them in the street; hence, a peddler or a packman.

Hawker (v. i.) To sell goods by outcry in the street.

Hawker (n.) A falconer.

Hawkey (n.) See Hockey.

Hawk-eyed (a.) Having a keen eye; sharpsighted; discerning.

Hawk moth () Any moth of the family Sphingidae, of which there are numerous genera and species. They are large, handsome moths, which fly mostly at twilight and hover about flowers like a humming bird, sucking the honey by means of a long, slender proboscis. The larvae are large, hairless caterpillars ornamented with green and other bright colors, and often with a caudal spine. See Sphinx, also Tobacco worm, and Tomato worm.

Hawkweed (n.) A plant of the genus Hieracium; -- so called from the ancient belief that birds of prey used its juice to strengthen their vision.

Hawkweed (n.) A plant of the genus Senecio (S. hieracifolius).

Hawm (n.) See Haulm, straw.

Hawm (v. i.) To lounge; to loiter.

Hawse (n.) A hawse hole.

Hawse (n.) The situation of the cables when a vessel is moored with two anchors, one on the starboard, the other on the port bow.

Hawse (n.) The distance ahead to which the cables usually extend; as, the ship has a clear or open hawse, or a foul hawse; to anchor in our hawse, or athwart hawse.

Hawse (n.) That part of a vessel's bow in which are the hawse holes for the cables.

Hawser (n.) A large rope made of three strands each containing many yarns.

Hawser-laid (a.) Made in the manner of a hawser. Cf. Cable-laid, and see Illust. of Cordage.

Hawthorn (n.) A thorny shrub or tree (the Crataegus oxyacantha), having deeply lobed, shining leaves, small, roselike, fragrant flowers, and a fruit called haw. It is much used in Europe for hedges, and for standards in gardens. The American hawthorn is Crataegus cordata, which has the leaves but little lobed.

Hay (n.) A hedge.

Hay (n.) A net set around the haunt of an animal, especially of a rabbit.

Hay (v. i.) To lay snares for rabbits.

Hay (n.) Grass cut and cured for fodder.

Hay (v. i.) To cut and cure grass for hay.

Haybird (n.) The European spotted flycatcher.

Haybird (n.) The European blackcap.

Haybote (n.) An allowance of wood to a tenant for repairing his hedges or fences; hedgebote. See Bote.

Haycock (n.) A conical pile or hear of hay in the field.

Hay-cutter (n.) A machine in which hay is chopped short, as fodder for cattle.

Hayfield (n.) A field where grass for hay has been cut; a meadow.

Hayfork (n.) A fork for pitching and tedding hay.

Hayloft (n.) A loft or scaffold for hay.

Haymaker (n.) One who cuts and cures hay.

Haymaker (n.) A machine for curing hay in rainy weather.

Haymaking (n.) The operation or work of cutting grass and curing it for hay.

Haymow (n.) A mow or mass of hay laid up in a barn for preservation.

Haymow (n.) The place in a barn where hay is deposited.

Hayrack (n.) A frame mounted on the running gear of a wagon, and used in hauling hay, straw, sheaves, etc.; -- called also hay rigging.

Hayrake (n.) A rake for collecting hay; especially, a large rake drawn by a horse or horses.

Hayrick (n.) A heap or pile of hay, usually covered with thatch for preservation in the open air.

Haystack (n.) A stack or conical pile of hay in the open air.

Haystalk (n.) A stalk of hay.

Haythorn (n.) Hawthorn.

Haytian (a.) Of pertaining to Hayti.

Haytian (n.) A native of Hayti.

Hayward (n.) An officer who is appointed to guard hedges, and to keep cattle from breaking or cropping them, and whose further duty it is to impound animals found running at large.

Hazard (n.) A game of chance played with dice.

Hazard (n.) The uncertain result of throwing a die; hence, a fortuitous event; chance; accident; casualty.

Hazard (n.) Risk; danger; peril; as, he encountered the enemy at the hazard of his reputation and life.

Hazard (n.) Holing a ball, whether the object ball (winning hazard) or the player's ball (losing hazard).

Hazard (n.) Anything that is hazarded or risked, as the stakes in gaming.

Hazarded (imp. & p. p.) of Hazard

Hazarding (p. pr. & vb. /) of Hazard

Hazard (n.) To expose to the operation of chance; to put in danger of loss or injury; to venture; to risk.

Hazard (n.) To venture to incur, or bring on.

Hazard (v. i.) To try the chance; to encounter risk or danger.

Hazardable (a.) Liable to hazard or chance; uncertain; risky.

Hazardable (a.) Such as can be hazarded or risked.

Hazarder (n.) A player at the game of hazard; a gamester.

Hazarder (n.) One who hazards or ventures.

Hazardize (n.) A hazardous attempt or situation; hazard.

Hazardous (a.) Exposed to hazard; dangerous; risky.

Hazardry (n.) Playing at hazard; gaming; gambling.

Hazardry (n.) Rashness; temerity.

Haze (n.) Light vapor or smoke in the air which more or less impedes vision, with little or no dampness; a lack of transparency in the air; hence, figuratively, obscurity; dimness.

Haze (v. i.) To be hazy, or tick with haze.

Hazed (imp. & p. p.) of Haze

Hazing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Haze

Haze (v. t.) To harass by exacting unnecessary, disagreeable, or difficult work.

Haze (v. t.) To harass or annoy by playing abusive or shameful tricks upon; to humiliate by practical jokes; -- used esp. of college students; as, the sophomores hazed a freshman.

Hazel (n.) A shrub or small tree of the genus Corylus, as the C. avellana, bearing a nut containing a kernel of a mild, farinaceous taste; the filbert. The American species are C. Americana, which produces the common hazelnut, and C. rostrata. See Filbert.

Hazel (n.) A miner's name for freestone.

Hazel (a.) Consisting of hazels, or of the wood of the hazel; pertaining to, or derived from, the hazel; as, a hazel wand.

Hazel (a.) Of a light brown color, like the hazelnut.

Hazeless (a.) Destitute of haze.

Hazelly (a.) Of the color of the hazelnut; of a light brown.

Hazelnut (n.) The nut of the hazel.

Hazelwort (n.) The asarabacca.

Hazily (adv.) In a hazy manner; mistily; obscurely; confusedly.

Haziness (n.) The quality or state of being hazy.

Hazle (v. t.) To make dry; to dry.

Hazy (n.) Thick with haze; somewhat obscured with haze; not clear or transparent.

Hazy (n.) Obscure; confused; not clear; as, a hazy argument; a hazy intellect.

He (obj.) The man or male being (or object personified to which the masculine gender is assigned), previously designated; a pronoun of the masculine gender, usually referring to a specified subject already indicated.

He (obj.) Any one; the man or person; -- used indefinitely, and usually followed by a relative pronoun.

He (obj.) Man; a male; any male person; -- in this sense used substantively.

-head (suffix.) A variant of -hood.

Head (n.) The anterior or superior part of an animal, containing the brain, or chief ganglia of the nervous system, the mouth, and in the higher animals, the chief sensory organs; poll; cephalon.

Head (n.) The uppermost, foremost, or most important part of an inanimate object; such a part as may be considered to resemble the head of an animal; often, also, the larger, thicker, or heavier part or extremity, in distinction from the smaller or thinner part, or from the point or edge; as, the head of a cane, a nail, a spear, an ax, a mast, a sail, a ship; that which covers and closes the top or the end of a hollow vessel; as, the head of a cask or a steam boiler.

Head (n.) The place where the head should go; as, the head of a bed, of a grave, etc.; the head of a carriage, that is, the hood which covers the head.

Head (n.) The most prominent or important member of any organized body; the chief; the leader; as, the head of a college, a school, a church, a state, and the like.

Head (n.) The place or honor, or of command; the most important or foremost position; the front; as, the head of the table; the head of a column of soldiers.

Head (n.) Each one among many; an individual; -- often used in a plural sense; as, a thousand head of cattle.

Head (n.) The seat of the intellect; the brain; the understanding; the mental faculties; as, a good head, that is, a good mind; it never entered his head, it did not occur to him; of his own head, of his own thought or will.

Head (n.) The source, fountain, spring, or beginning, as of a stream or river; as, the head of the Nile; hence, the altitude of the source, or the height of the surface, as of water, above a given place, as above an orifice at which it issues, and the pressure resulting from the height or from motion; sometimes also, the quantity in reserve; as, a mill or reservoir has a good head of water, or ten feet head; also, that part of a gulf or bay most remote from the outlet or the sea.

Head (n.) A headland; a promontory; as, Gay Head.

Head (n.) A separate part, or topic, of a discourse; a theme to be expanded; a subdivision; as, the heads of a sermon.

Head (n.) Culminating point or crisis; hence, strength; force; height.

Head (n.) Power; armed force.

Head (n.) A headdress; a covering of the head; as, a laced head; a head of hair.

Head (n.) An ear of wheat, barley, or of one of the other small cereals.

Head (n.) A dense cluster of flowers, as in clover, daisies, thistles; a capitulum.

Head (n.) A dense, compact mass of leaves, as in a cabbage or a lettuce plant.

Head (n.) The antlers of a deer.

Head (n.) A rounded mass of foam which rises on a pot of beer or other effervescing liquor.

Head (n.) Tiles laid at the eaves of a house.

Head (a.) Principal; chief; leading; first; as, the head master of a school; the head man of a tribe; a head chorister; a head cook.

Headed (imp. & p. p.) of Head

Heading (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Head

Head (v. t.) To be at the head of; to put one's self at the head of; to lead; to direct; to act as leader to; as, to head an army, an expedition, or a riot.

Head (v. t.) To form a head to; to fit or furnish with a head; as, to head a nail.

Head (v. t.) To behead; to decapitate.

Head (v. t.) To cut off the top of; to lop off; as, to head trees.

Head (v. t.) To go in front of; to get in the front of, so as to hinder or stop; to oppose; hence, to check or restrain; as, to head a drove of cattle; to head a person; the wind heads a ship.

Head (v. t.) To set on the head; as, to head a cask.

Head (v. i.) To originate; to spring; to have its source, as a river.

Head (v. i.) To go or point in a certain direction; to tend; as, how does the ship head?

Head (v. i.) To form a head; as, this kind of cabbage heads early.

Headache (n.) Pain in the head; cephalalgia.

Headachy (a.) Afflicted with headache.

Headband (n.) A fillet; a band for the head.

Headband (n.) The band at each end of the back of a book.

Headbeard (n.) A board or boarding which marks or forms the head of anything; as, the headboard of a bed; the headboard of a grave.

Headborough (n.) Alt. of Headborrow

Headborrow (n.) The chief of a frankpledge, tithing, or decennary, consisting of ten families; -- called also borsholder, boroughhead, boroughholder, and sometimes tithingman. See Borsholder.

Headborrow (n.) A petty constable.

Head-cheese (n.) A dish made of portions of the head, or head and feet, of swine, cut up fine, seasoned, and pressed into a cheeselike mass.

Headdress (n.) A covering or ornament for the head; a headtire.

Headdress (n.) A manner of dressing the hair or of adorning it, whether with or without a veil, ribbons, combs, etc.

Headed (a.) Furnished with a head (commonly as denoting intellectual faculties); -- used in composition; as, clear-headed, long-headed, thick-headed; a many-headed monster.

Headed (a.) Formed into a head; as, a headed cabbage.

Header (n.) One who, or that which, heads nails, rivets, etc., esp. a machine for heading.

Header (n.) One who heads a movement, a party, or a mob; head; chief; leader.

Header (n.) A brick or stone laid with its shorter face or head in the surface of the wall.

Header (n.) In framing, the piece of timber fitted between two trimmers, and supported by them, and carrying the ends of the tailpieces.

Header (n.) A reaper for wheat, that cuts off the heads only.

Header (n.) A fall or plunge headforemost, as while riding a bicycle, or in bathing; as, to take a header.

Headfirst (adv.) Alt. of Headforemost

Headforemost (adv.) With the head foremost.

Headfish (n.) The sunfish (Mola).

Head gear (n.) Alt. of Headgear

Headgear (n.) Headdress.

Headgear (n.) Apparatus above ground at the mouth of a mine or deep well.

Head-hunter (n.) A member of any tribe or race of savages who have the custom of decapitating human beings and preserving their heads as trophies. The Dyaks of Borneo are the most noted head-hunters.

Headily (adv.) In a heady or rash manner; hastily; rashly; obstinately.

Headiness (n.) The quality of being heady.

Heading (n.) The act or state of one who, or that which, heads; formation of a head.

Heading (n.) That which stands at the head; title; as, the heading of a paper.

Heading (n.) Material for the heads of casks, barrels, etc.

Heading (n.) A gallery, drift, or adit in a mine; also, the end of a drift or gallery; the vein above a drift.

Heading (n.) The extension of a line ruffling above the line of stitch.

Heading (n.) That end of a stone or brick which is presented outward.

Headland (n.) A cape; a promontory; a point of land projecting into the sea or other expanse of water.

Headland (n.) A ridge or strip of unplowed at the ends of furrows, or near a fence.

Headless (a.) Having no head; beheaded; as, a headless body, neck, or carcass.